A: Planetary density will decrease.; B: Planetary years will become longer.; C: Planetary days will become shorter.; D: Planetary gravity will become stronger.
A: buildings will be built faster; B: buildings will be made safer; C: building designs will look nicer; D: building materials will be cheaper
A: Chemical energy is absorbed through the roots.; B: Light energy is converted to chemical energy.; C: Chlorophyll in the leaf captures light energy.; D: Sunlight is converted into chlorophyll.
A: the control; B: the hypothesis statement; C: the dependent (responding) variable; D: the independent (manipulated) variable
A: They have each lost kinetic energy.; B: They have each gained the same amount of potential energy.; C: They have each lost the same amount of potential energy.; D: They have each gained one-half of their maximum kinetic energy.
A: a non-infectious, cell-cycle disease; B: an infectious, cell-cycle disease; C: a non-infectious, chronic disease; D: an infectious, chronic disease
A: to repare for migration before winter; B: to provide warmth during the cold winter months; C: to store food that will be eaten over the winter months; D: to protect the grasses and seeds from decay before winter
A: There was once more water in the area.; B: The area was once grassland.; C: The climate in the area was once tropical.; D: There are active faults in the area.
A: The chicken population would go down.; B: Populations of mice and rats would increase.; C: Another bird of prey would replace the hawk.; D: The chickens would have a lower rate of disease.
A: the atom; B: the electron; C: the nucleus; D: the proton
A: life processes; B: size differences; C: plasma membranes; D: energy molecules
A: The Sun influences the formation of waves.; B: The Sun creates water particles.; C: The Sun's rays cause organisms to come to the surface.; D: The Sun provides minerals.
A: 32° F; B: 41° F; C: 78° F; D: 98° F
A: Repeat the investigation.; B: Write a report of the results.; C: Make a table for recording data.; D: Make daily observations of the light bulbs.
A: ozone; B: methane; C: water vapor; D: carbon dioxide
A: 0 degrees Celsius; B: 32 degrees Celsius; C: 100 degrees Celsius; D: 212 degrees Celsius
A: exclude research on teeth or bones; B: predict what the next discovery will be; C: analyze new data as it becomes available; D: delete earlier reports that were missing the new findings
A: from the ice to the tea; B: from the tea to the ice; C: from the pitcher to the tea; D: from the ice to the pitcher
A: the price of boards will increase; B: the price of boards will decrease; C: there will be more boards available; D: there will be more trees for logging
A: the discovery of the atom.; B: better surgical techniques.; C: continued experimentation.; D: the invention of the microscope.
A: building proteins; B: breaking down wastes; C: controlling the activities of the cell; D: converting energy from one form into another
A: H_{2}O -> H + O + H; B: 2H_{2}O(l) -> 2H_{2}(g) + O_{2}(g); C: H:O:H -> H_{2}O; D: H_{2}O(l) -> 2H(g) + O(g)
A: Penguins can live in climates with freezing temperatures.; B: Penguins are fierce competitors.; C: Penguins are some of the most beautiful birds.; D: Penguins make great pets.
A: 43°F.; B: 50°F.; C: 73°F.; D: 90°F.
A: gas.; B: water.; C: wind.; D: clouds.
A: It condensed.; B: It evaporated.; C: It became a gas.; D: It became a solid.
A: It is a constant climate feature throughout the year.; B: It is a seasonal weather feature with irregular occurrences.; C: It is a continuous weather feature during the season in which it occurs.; D: It is a rare event inconsistent with local climate and weather.
A: Object 1, Object 2, Object 3; B: Object 1, Object 3, Object 2; C: Object 2, Object 1, Object 3; D: Object 2, Object 3, Object 1
A: Plankton are colorful.; B: Plankton clean the water.; C: Plankton release oxygen.; D: Plankton reproduce quickly.
A: Wood is porous.; B: Wood is buoyant.; C: Wood is light.; D: Wood is magnetic.
A: how each organism died; B: the exact age of the fossils; C: when the fossils were discovered; D: the type of environment in which the organisms lived
A: its ability to freeze; B: its specific heat capacity; C: its ability to exist as a liquid; D: its high surface tension
A: Air is a mixture of gases.; B: Ice is a mixture of gases.; C: Air is a liquid.; D: Ice is a liquid.
A: It makes some people upset.; B: It takes a long time to be useful.; C: It helps explain how things work.; D: It causes work to be more difficult.
A: sunrise; B: equinox; C: full moon; D: solar eclipse
A: Volcanism also characterizes the region.; B: Earthquake centers in the region occur at shallow depths.; C: The region shows extensive faulting of sediments.; D: Equal crust densities are found on opposite sides of the region.
A: The sun would be enormous next to an average star.; B: The sun would be tiny next to one of the largest stars.; C: The sun would be extremely bright next to an average star.; D: The sun would be very dim next to one of the smallest stars.
A: The gas planets are closer to the Sun.; B: The solid planets are closer to the Sun.; C: The planets are arranged in order of increasing size.; D: The solid planets are much larger than the gas planets.
A: to change oxygen into carbon dioxide; B: to break down sugar into usable chemicals; C: to convert energy from sunlight into food energy; D: to allow the passage of carbon dioxide into the plant
A: Hydraulic systems are under pressure and pneumatic systems are not.; B: Hydraulic systems involve liquids and pneumatic systems involve gases.; C: Hydraulic systems are open systems and pneumatic systems are closed systems.; D: Hydraulic systems involve fluids in motion and pneumatic systems involve fluids at rest.
A: completing its life cycle; B: beginning hibernation; C: responding to its environment; D: preparing for migration
A: The Moon rises.; B: The new Moon occurs.; C: The Moon cycles through its phases.; D: The Moon passes in front of the Sun.
A: 6; B: 7; C: 13; D: 19
A: the frequency of the wave; B: the wavelength of the wave; C: the source that created the sound; D: the distance between molecules in the medium
1: Kinetic energy decreases and potential energy increases.; 2: Kinetic energy increases and potential energy decreases.; 3: Both potential energy and kinetic energy decrease.; 4: Both potential energy and kinetic energy increase.
A: oil.; B: heat.; C: a magnet.; D: rubbing alcohol.
A: radar; B: compass; C: satellite; D: radio
A: balance; B: hot plate; C: stopwatch; D: thermometer
A: embryonic structures.; B: homologous structures.; C: analogous structures.; D: vestigial structures.
A: A tiger hunts a deer.; B: A mouse runs from a coyote.; C: A salmon migrates up a river.; D: A woodpecker taps a tree for insects.
A: more than 20 g because of the addition of heat; B: more than 20 g because there are now two substances; C: less than 20 g because oxygen gas is very light; D: 20 g because no matter is added or removed
A: observe clouds forming; B: measure the air temperature; C: blow up a beach ball or balloon; D: weigh a glass before and after it is filled with water
A: converging boundaries; B: diverging boundaries; C: transform faults; D: rift zones
A: An insect is food for a salmon.; B: Water carries a rock downstream.; C: A tree removes a gas from the air.; D: A flower makes food for a butterfly.
A: volcanic eruptions; B: tectonic movements; C: asteroid impacts; D: solar flares
A: A group of people swims in a river.; B: A construction crew builds an iron bridge.; C: A farmer grows vegetables to sell at a local market.; D: A person bakes a cake with electricity produced by a hydroelectric power plant.
A: a map; B: a diagram; C: a chart; D: a graph
A: to generate an electric current; B: to increase the strength of the magnet; C: to heat the copper wire; D: to transfer protons to the lightbulb
A: Body weight; B: Eye color; C: Blood type; D: Color blindness
A: Halve the mass of m_{1} and halve the distance between m_{1} and m_{2}.; B: Halve the mass of m_{1} and double the distance between m_{1} and m_{2}.; C: Double the mass of m_{1} and halve the distance between m_{1} and m_{2}.; D: Double the mass of m_{1} and double the distance between m_{1} and m_{2}.
A: Na + Cl_{2}; B: NaCL + OH; C: NaOH + Cl; D: NaCl + H_{2}O
A: to scatter seeds; B: to capture sunlight; C: to shade the trunk; D: to collect water
A: circulatory; B: digestive; C: excretory; D: respiratory
A: kidney; B: heart; C: gill; D: skin
A: They both move at the same rate.; B: They both move away from light.; C: They both move in the same direction.; D: They both move toward an energy source.
A: Traits from two parents are combined.; B: More organisms reproduce this way.; C: Offspring grow in different environments.; D: Offspring come from identical parents.
A: W is the softest of the four substances tested.; B: W is the hardest of the four substances tested.; C: W can scratch Y.; D: W can scratch X.
A: leaching of soils; B: evaporation rates; C: runoff from rains; D: amounts of sunlight
A: eroding land.; B: melting glacial ice.; C: volcanic emissions.; D: reactions on the sea floor.
A: Earth is heated by the Sun.; B: Mountains direct moist air upward.; C: Water forms droplets when cooled.; D: Most of Earth is covered with water.
A: 4; B: 3; C: 2; D: 1
A: a large funnel; B: a screen filter; C: a horseshoe magnet; D: a magnifying glass
A: depths of the oceans.; B: speed of currents in the oceans.; C: chemical compositions of the oceans.; D: amount of dissolved oxygen in the oceans.
A: stop flowing.; B: create waves.; C: move faster and cleaner.; D: become deeper and wider.
A: nonliving parts of the environment; B: living organisms in the environment; C: health of the living organisms in the environment; D: protection, management, and renewal of resources
A: only the Sun; B: the Sun and the Moon; C: the Sun, the Moon, and some planets; D: the Sun, the Moon, some planets, and comets
A: compare the shapes of the two cells; B: check to see which diagram shows a nucleus; C: check to see which diagram shows cytoplasm; D: compare the number of vacuoles in the two cells
A: when tadpoles need to swim immediately; B: when there is a limited amount of water in their environment; C: when there is a decrease in the number of predators; D: when tadpoles need to blend in with their surroundings
A: Gravity exerts a balanced force on the object.; B: An unbalanced force causes acceleration.; C: Friction is applied to the object.; D: The forces acting on the object are in equilibrium.
A: cut grass; B: paper cups; C: newspapers; D: cut down trees
A: emission of waste; B: respiration in animals; C: photosynthesis in plants; D: formation of fossil fuels
A: moving through the water; B: producing oxygen; C: attracting prey; D: escaping predators
A: a gas.; B: a liquid.; C: a solid.; D: a vapor.
A: lit candles.; B: atomic models.; C: reflected light.; D: the scientific method.
A: type of plant; B: height of plant; C: amount of fertilizer; D: type of fertilizer
A: 24 hours; B: 28 days; C: 13 weeks; D: 1 year
A: to explain the mechanism that caused the continents to move; B: to consider the glacial evidence as outdated; C: to explain the extinction of the dinosaurs; D: to consider it unlikely that the continents were once together
A: Flossing has proven to be an effective method of improving oral health.; B: Many infectious diseases, such as gum disease, are caused by microorganisms.; C: In general, any method that reduces bacteria in the mouth will improve oral health.; D: An individual who flosses daily will be less likely to get gum disease than one who flosses weekly.
A: 0.025 kg x m/s; B: 3.8 kg x m/s; C: 6.0 kg x m/s; D: 270 kg x m/s
A: creating a dominant allele; B: affecting gamete formation; C: leading to tumors in tissue; D: being passed on to offspring
A: the Milky Way galaxy; B: moons of other planets; C: asteroids; D: Pluto
A: an anchor holding a boat in place; B: a snack company producing energy bars; C: a colorful sign attracting people into a store; D: an elevator transporting supplies from one floor to another
A: Only the salt and water is a mixture.; B: Only the pepper and water is a solution.; C: Both jars contain solutions.; D: Both jars contain mixtures.
A: construct a prototype of a boat for testing; B: calculate the total mass of all of the finished boats; C: determine the total amount of weight each boat can carry; D: test the strength of each material used to construct the boats
A: alert residents to the possibility of fire.; B: warn residents when a dangerous gas is present.; C: tell people that it is time to check the smoke detector.; D: advise people of an increase in temperature in the home.
A: changes in state.; B: states of matter.; C: properties of matter.; D: changes in properties.
A: choose the best environment for their adaptations.; B: pass beneficial behavior genes onto their offspring.; C: alter their behavior based on past experience.; D: change their environment in beneficial ways.
A: Magma or lava is cooled.; B: Materials are pressed together.; C: Chemical reactions change minerals.; D: Earthquakes cause small pieces to fall.
A: vacuole, chloroplast, nucleus; B: cell membrane, nucleus, mitochondrion; C: nucleus, cell wall, cell membrane; D: mitochondrion, vacuole, cell wall
A: The ball makes light.; B: The ball reflects light.; C: The ball absorbs light and then releases it.; D: The ball absorbs light and keeps it inside.
A: The technology is a scientific advancement.; B: Electric cars store energy in batteries.; C: The technology is environmentally friendly.; D: Everyone is getting an electric car.
A: The fur gives up protons to the rod.; B: The rod gives up electrons to the air.; C: The fur gains protons from the rod.; D: The rod gains electrons from the fur.
A: making fine incisions.; B: illuminating operating fields.; C: stitching wounds.; D: disinfecting instruments.
A: most ozone.; B: greatest density.; C: highest altitude.; D: coldest temperature.
A: bright light; B: dark glasses; C: breathing masks; D: hot plates
A: You get thirsty and urinate more.; B: You get thirsty and urinate less.; C: You get hungry and sweat more.; D: You get hungry and sweat less.
A: rusting; B: melting; C: evaporation; D: neutralization
A: The dog and tapeworm both become ill.; B: The dog becomes ill, and the tapeworm benefits.; C: The tapeworm and dog help each other survive.; D: The tapeworm helps the dog survive.
A: becoming an herbivore.; B: using its inherited traits.; C: finding a new ecosystem.; D: learning a new behavior.
A: Hills; B: Thick atmosphere; C: Thunderstorms; D: Oceans
A: They will always produce round seeds.; B: They will only produce wrinkled seeds.; C: Each offspring plant will have some round and some wrinkled seeds.; D: Unless the plant with wrinkled seeds was pure recessive, no prediction can be made.
A: balance; B: microscope; C: meter stick; D: litmus paper
A: will flow toward areas of lower pressure in valleys.; B: will flow toward areas of higher pressure in valleys.; C: is considered to be less dense than warmer air.; D: is considered to be free of oxygen atoms.
A: table salt; B: granulated sugar; C: carbon dioxide; D: motor oil
A: electrical energy to heat energy.; B: chemical energy to electrical energy.; C: electrical energy to radiant energy.; D: kinetic energy to potential energy.
A: The atom loses a proton.; B: The atom attracts additional electrons.; C: The atom increases in atomic mass.; D: The atom becomes negatively charged.
A: erosion of the stream bank; B: deposition of material in the stream; C: amount of material carried downstream; D: size of the particles carried downstream
A: Minerals are made of rocks.; B: Crystals are made of rocks.; C: Rocks are made of one or more minerals.; D: Magma is made of solid rock.
A: 84 km/h; B: 105 km/h; C: 180 km/h; D: 210 km/h
A: to help scientists in conservation efforts; B: to determine the geographical habitats of all organisms; C: to have a consistent definition for all scientists; D: to understand the role of organisms in a food web
A: the ability to revolve around the central ball; B: a magnet in each ball; C: a representation of oceans on each ball; D: a source of thermal energy
A: slower; B: faster; C: at the same speed
A: discourage landfills.; B: increase Earth's surface area.; C: eliminate groundwater pollution.; D: create recreational ponds and lakes.
A: solar heating is greatest near the equator.; B: the Moon's plane of orbit is close to the equator.; C: Earth's volcanic activity is clustered around the equator.; D: the rate of rotation of Earth's surface is less at the equator.
A: Antibodies produce proteins that attach to an invading virus.; B: Antibodies attach to an invading virus as a target marker.; C: Antibodies engulf the invading virus as a defense mechanism.; D: Antibodies release enzymes that lyse the invading virus.
A: start producing oxygen.; B: begin dividing into more cells.; C: become a different type of cell.; D: stop sending signals to the brain.
A: iron; B: carbon; C: nitrogen; D: hydrogen
A: condensation; B: evaporation; C: precipitation; D: transpiration
1: sunlight; 2: oxygen; 3: carbon dioxide; 4: dead organisms
A: division of cells; B: replication of DNA; C: formation of a cell plate; D: separation of chromatids
A: freckles; B: hair style; C: eye color; D: dimples
A: iodine, iron, nickel; B: helium, carbon, gold; C: sodium, chromium, copper; D: phosphorus, nitrogen, oxygen
A: runoff of water.; B: erosion of sand dunes.; C: compaction of rock layers.; D: decomposition of plants and animals.
A: mass; B: weight; C: body density; D: body temperature
A: the erosion of land along the coastline; B: the buildup of dunes along the coast over time; C: the new construction of buildings along the coastline; D: the buildup of organic material from oil rigs along the coast
1: separated by a much larger ocean; 2: joined together as one landmass; 3: located near the North Pole; 4: in a different hemisphere
A: purification of an ore; B: the growth of a crystal; C: a liquid becoming a solid; D: sedimentation of granules
A: Are tulips better than other flowers?; B: What genes determine tulip petal color?; C: Why do people like to look at tulips?; D: Which color of tulips is the prettiest?
A: maximum load the bridge can support; B: cost of material used to build the bridge; C: percent of materials that can be recycled; D: speed with which the bridge can be constructed
A: number of protons; B: state of matter; C: atomic mass; D: temperature
A: It helped people use less gas.; B: It kept people from driving too fast.; C: It made cars easier for people to buy.; D: It made cars safer to drive in bad weather.
A: The assembly takes more time.; B: More workers are needed for assembly.; C: There are fewer injuries to workers.; D: More mistakes are made during the assembly.
A: deposition of sediments; B: uplifting of a mountain; C: formation of ocean trenches; D: movement of tectonic plates
A: Endothermic because energy is absorbed.; B: Endothermic because energy is released.; C: Exothermic because energy is absorbed.; D: Exothermic because energy is released.
A: plastic soda bottles; B: aluminum cans; C: porcelain cups; D: copper pot
A: A flat surface is gradually pushed up into higher and higher mountains until the Earth is covered with mountains.; B: High mountains gradually wear down until most of the Earth is at sea level.; C: High mountains gradually wear down as new mountains are continuously being formed, over and over again.; D: High mountains and flat plains stay side by side for billions of years with little change.
A: sand; B: producers; C: salt water; D: sea shells
A: burns at a cooler temperature.; B: is always larger than other suns.; C: has greater density and gravity.; D: fuses hydrogen to make helium.
A: 3; B: 5; C: 6; D: 8
A: brain; B: liver; C: skin; D: stomach
A: potassium.; B: phosphorus.; C: carbohydrates.; D: nitrogen.
A: heat; B: chemical; C: mechanical; D: electromagnetic
A: runoff from a river.; B: weathering by waves.; C: erosion of rock debris.; D: a buildup of cooled lava.
A: light energy changed to heat energy; B: heat energy changed to chemical energy; C: chemical energy changed to heat energy; D: chemical energy changed to light energy
A: The tile floor is colder than the carpet.; B: The tile floor conducts heat better than the carpet.; C: The carpet conducts heat better than the tile floor.; D: The tile floor is a better insulator than the carpet.
A: their sleek skin.; B: swimming very fast.; C: their body shape.; D: traveling alone.
A: uracil; B: thymine; C: guanine; D: adenine
A: glass breaks into pieces.; B: dough bakes in an oven.; C: ice cream melts into a liquid.; D: electricity flows through a wire.
A: the circulatory system; B: the nervous system; C: the skeletal system; D: the digestive system
A: glass breaking; B: a garbage can rusting; C: sugar dissolving in water; D: water evaporating from a sidewalk
A: repair your broken television; B: buy a television that is on sale; C: throw old televisions in the trash; D: donate a new television to your school
A: A glass bottle; B: A metal can; C: A plastic bottle; D: An apple core
A: The population of fish will increase.; B: The insects will become more resistant to the pesticide.; C: The lake will be unable to support life.; D: The fish will find another food source.
A: people need to be informed about the scientific process.; B: data often supports more than one explanation.; C: it deters other scientists from duplicating research.; D: it ensures that researchers receive credit.
A: biofuel; B: hydroelectricity; C: geothermal heat; D: solar radiation
A: electron; B: nucleus; C: neutron; D: proton
A: sunlight and soil; B: oxygen and carbon dioxide; C: food and nesting areas; D: soil and salt water
A: Meat, milk, and a piece of chocolate; B: Bread, vegetables, and fish; C: Vegetables, fruits, and water; D: Meat, fish, and bread
A: heat insulation.; B: electric conduction.; C: a low melting point.; D: a nonstick surface.
A: a force that pushes straight up; B: a force that pushes straight down; C: a force that pushes the same direction that the car is moving; D: a force that pushes the opposite of the direction that the car is moving
A: C_{2}H_{6} + 3O_{2} -> 2CO_{2} + 3H_{2}O; B: C_{2}H_{6} + 5O_{2} -> 2CO_{2} + 3H_{2}O; C: 2C_{2}H_{6} + 5O_{2} -> 4CO_{2} + 4H_{2}O; D: 2C_{2}H_{6} + 7O_{2} -> 4CO_{2} + 6H_{2}O
A: only one wavelength that we see as yellow.; B: a narrow band of wavelengths that is entirely visible light.; C: mostly long wavelengths that become heat energy.; D: a range of many wavelengths from long to very short.
A: It is insoluble and difficult to clean up.; B: It dissolves in water and causes acid rain.; C: It enter storm drains and contaminates surface water.; D: It leaks onto the ground and contaminates soil and ground water.
A: nutritional imbalance; B: fractured bone; C: abnormal cellular reproduction; D: foreign bacteria
A: Humans; B: Birds; C: Fish; D: Reptiles
A: The boiling point of oxygen is colder than room temperature.; B: The boiling point of bromine is colder than room temperature.; C: The melting point of oxygen is warmer than room temperature.; D: The melting point of bromine is warmer than room temperature.
A: parasitism; B: saprophytism; C: mutualism; D: commensalism
A: multiple methods are acceptable for organizing data.; B: melting point data is inconsistent.; C: the scientists collected data in different areas.; D: the data was measured with different instruments.
A: MgBr; B: MgBr_{2}; C: Mg_{2}Br; D: Mg_{3}Br_{2}
A: unhappy.; B: confused.; C: confident.; D: generous.
A: eyeglasses; B: mirrors; C: silver bowl; D: television sets
A: a decrease in temperature; B: a decrease in biodiversity; C: an increase in the number of predators; D: an increase in the number of decomposers
A: heating; B: recrystallization; C: compaction; D: weathering
A: some water dripped over the side.; B: the water soaked through the glass.; C: water vapor condensed on the sides.; D: someone sprayed the glass with water.
A: The amount of cellular energy would decrease.; B: The amount of cellular energy would increase.; C: The amount of glucose produced would increase.; D: The amount of glucose produced would decrease.
A: Velocity and acceleration both remain positive.; B: Velocity and acceleration both become negative.; C: Velocity remains positive but acceleration becomes negative.; D: Velocity becomes negative but acceleration remains positive.
A: Nitrogen will replace oxygen in the water.; B: The temperature of the water will increase.; C: Wave action will carry away the dead algae.; D: Bottom dwellers will die and fish will swim away.
A: The ball went south.; B: The ball flew for 4.5 s.; C: The ball traveled 97 m.; D: The ball has a mass of 0.20 kg.
A: breeding.; B: hibernation.; C: migration.; D: navigation.
A: waterproof fur; B: webbed hind feet; C: large, sharp teeth; D: flat, wide tail
A: bar graph; B: line graph; C: scatterplot; D: stem and leaf
A: 8:05 in the morning; B: 12:05 in the afternoon; C: 4:05 in the afternoon; D: 7:05 in the evening
A: erosion of rocks; B: evaporation of water; C: heating of the core; D: melting of the crust
A: type of plant; B: amount of water; C: amount of sunlight; D: number of fruits
A: by checking their rain gauges hourly; B: by using identical rain gauges in each location; C: by collecting temperature data along with rainfall; D: by collecting rainfall data while it is raining
A: reflecting light rays away from the eyes; B: refracting more light rays into the eyes; C: reflecting more light rays into the eyes; D: refracting light rays away from the eyes
A: There would be smaller tides on Earth.; B: There would be bigger tides on Earth.; C: Objects would weigh more on Earth.; D: Objects would weigh less on Earth.
A: a statue being weathered by acid rain; B: a glacier advancing and retreating; C: tree leaves changing colors; D: soil depth increasing
A: There is always more water in the morning.; B: Smaller amounts of water evaporate in the cool morning.; C: Water used in the morning can be recycled for afternoon use.; D: Grass can absorb water only in the morning.
A: Liquid water holds its shape.; B: Water changes to a gas as it boils.; C: Ice becomes a liquid when it freezes.; D: Solid ice changes shape with its container.
A: Rocks were dissolved by water.; B: Lava deposited and then cooled.; C: The remains of plants and animals were trapped.; D: Air, water, and minerals combined.
A: scientific laws change often.; B: scientific investigations are generally flawed.; C: scientists may interpret data differently.; D: scientists believe experiments should be repeated.
A: the mass; B: the speed; C: the texture; D: the volume
A: The tea has an odor.; B: The tea spreads evenly through the water.; C: The tea and water separate easily.; D: The tea settles to the bottom of the container.
A: rotational speed; B: apparent brightness; C: surface temperature; D: chemical composition
A: 975 grams; B: 1,000 grams; C: 1,025 grams; D: 2,500 grams
A: by providing habitat for large fish and plants; B: by providing habitat for algae and small invertebrates; C: by providing habitat for marine mammals and plants; D: by providing habitat for bacteria and fungi
A: Heat transferred from the chocolate chips to the bag.; B: Heat evaporated from the bag to the chocolate chips.; C: Heat transferred from the environment to the chocolate chips.; D: Heat condensed from her hand to the chocolate chips.
A: It is a learned behavior that maintains the population.; B: It is a learned behavior that maintains salt concentrations.; C: It is an inherited behavior that maintains the population.; D: It is an inherited behavior that maintains salt concentrations.
A: Compare their blood types.; B: Compare their handwriting.; C: Compare their genes.; D: Compare their fingerprints.
A: It is completely destroyed.; B: It is completely changed into heat energy.; C: It changes into other types of matter and energy.; D: It physically changes into the gaseous phase.
A: 0.2 km/h^2; B: 3.0 km/h^2; C: 6.0 km/h^2; D: 12.0 km/h^2
A: rubber is used as a transmitter.; B: rubber helps to ground them.; C: rubber is a nonconductor.; D: rubber is a conductor.
A: the amount of air in each ball; B: the distance each ball is dropped; C: the time it takes to drop each ball; D: the number of times the ball bounces
A: Research articles about different ways to heat popcorn to make it pop.; B: Design an experiment that tests multiple types of popcorn using repeated trials.; C: Heat kernels of some types on an electric stove and heat other types on a gas stove.; D: Construct a mathematical equation that compares size and mass of kernels from each type.
A: was destroyed by the steel wall.; B: was converted into heat.; C: disappeared into the atmosphere.; D: was stopped by the hard surface.
A: building an apartment complex; B: allowing fishing in more rivers; C: creating a zoo for endangered species; D: limiting construction in wooded areas
A: cracking a rock and making a U-shaped valley; B: making a dune and making a U-shaped valley; C: making a dune and making a V-shaped valley; D: cracking a rock and making a V-shaped valley
A: oil; B: coal; C: trees; D: aluminum
A: air friction stopped the ball.; B: gravity changed the ball's direction.; C: the ball was not thrown hard enough.; D: the ball was not thrown straight up.
A: pencils falling from the same height; B: balloons floating upward from the same height; C: a bicycle speeding up on a flat surface; D: a ball slowing down on a flat surface
A: Salt is the solvent and water is the solute.; B: Salt is the solute and water is the solvent.; C: Salt is the solvent and water is the solution.; D: Salt is the solution and water is the solvent.
A: folded rock.; B: earthquakes.; C: plate tectonics.; D: glacier deposition.
A: Check the bread each day.; B: Record the temperature of the bread.; C: Measure the weight of the bread.; D: Give the bread different amounts of light.
A: sunlight; B: water; C: green plants; D: decomposers
A: an inference made from observations.; B: an observation made from predictions.; C: a prediction made from data samples.; D: a hypothesis made from inference.
A: Both are renewable.; B: Both are nonrenewable.; C: Coal is nonrenewable; water is renewable.; D: Coal is renewable; water is nonrenewable.
A: The Internet has eliminated the need for the library.; B: People are able to access information from many locations.; C: People can now do their work from home.; D: The Internet allows students to concentrate more on homework.
A: exothermic.; B: endothermic.; C: suspension.; D: vaporization.
A: making the wall stronger.; B: using storage space efficiently.; C: using a machine for more than one purpose.; D: solving the need for shelter in a creative way.
A: It will stabilize as the birth rate equals the death rate.; B: It will continue to increase steadily from year to year.; C: It will increase as other herbivores move into the region.; D: It will decrease due to overcrowding causing a food shortage.
A: crop farmers; B: oil companies; C: grocery stores; D: car manufacturers
A: magnetism; B: oxygen; C: light; D: heat
A: 2; B: 3; C: 4; D: 5
A: 2; B: 4; C: 8; D: 16
A: Motion changes to stored energy.; B: Stored energy changes to motion and heat.; C: Heat changes to motion and stored energy.; D: Motion changes to chemical energy.
A: where the safety goggles are stored.; B: what number to call for poison control.; C: where the fire extinguisher is located.; D: which materials are safe to use for cleaning.
A: eliminates air pollution; B: saves nonrenewable energy; C: reduces the amount of oxygen in the air; D: keeps the habitats of animals from being destroyed
A: use a rock with the known mineral to strike the sample; B: rub the sample on a piece of unglazed clay tile; C: use a file to break off a piece of the sample; D: scratch the sample with an iron nail
A: ice, water, steam; B: ice, steam, water; C: steam, ice, water; D: steam, water, ice
A: Stay on the paths.; B: Not take samples.; C: Take photographs.; D: Leave the area exactly as they found it.
A: increase in the number of parks; B: decline in the amount of seawater; C: increase in number of homes built; D: decline in the amount of predators
A: do the experiment many times; B: keep a record of all procedures; C: make a model of the set-up of the experiment; D: change some of the conditions of the experiment
A: hot rock; B: fossil fuel; C: thick crust; D: warm climate
A: The masses cannot be compared without a balance.; B: The mass of the feathers is less than the mass of the nails.; C: The mass of the feathers is the same as the mass of the nails.; D: The mass of the feathers is greater than the mass of the nails.
A: current weather; B: weather forecast; C: general climate; D: climate changes
A: elevation; B: population; C: latitude; D: longitude
A: electromagnetic; B: heat; C: longitudinal; D: transverse
A: volcanic eruption; B: burning coal; C: forest fire; D: oil spill
A: air pressure.; B: kinetic energy.; C: potential energy.; D: wind movement.
A: earthquake; B: landslide; C: volcano; D: wind
A: steep drop in ocean salinity and density; B: steep drop in ocean volume and area; C: increased exposure of oceans to ultraviolet radiation; D: increased exposure of tsunamis to ocean life
A: It ate more food.; B: It was more active.; C: It drank more water.; D: It received more sunlight.
A: carbohydrate; B: cytoplasm; C: phospholipid; D: protein
A: the wax of a candle at room temperature; B: the water in a glass of ice water; C: the steam from a cup of coffee; D: the ice cube in a glass of tea
A: heavier rainfall; B: dryer conditions; C: cold temperatures; D: frequent hurricanes
A: a proton.; B: a neutron.; C: a nucleus.; D: an electron.
A: an increase in competition for food resources among small prey; B: a greater opportunity for primary producers to flourish; C: an increase in the population of tertiary consumers; D: a greater balance of predator-prey relationships
A: because of the amount of sunlight they receive; B: because of their closeness to the ocean; C: because of the inherited information inside the seeds; D: because of the type of insects that eat the needles
A: 15 minutes; B: 25 minutes; C: 2 hours; D: 4 hours
A: nuclear power plants; B: hydroelectric power plants; C: coal-burning factories; D: noncommercial farms
A: oil; B: gas; C: coal; D: wind
A: the type of hair their parents have; B: the type of hair their brothers and sisters have; C: their hair color; D: their skin color
A: mass of +3.; B: mass of -3.; C: charge of +3.; D: charge of -3.
A: Moving to a warmer climate in winter; B: Eating out of the hands of humans; C: Hunting for their own food; D: Staying away from people
A: The water changes from a solid into a gas.; B: The water changes from a liquid into a gas.; C: The water changes from a liquid into a solid.; D: The water changes from a solid into a liquid.
A: Plants can use underground water.; B: Plants can live without water.; C: Plants release oxygen.; D: Plants cannot move.
A: Fallen trees create a risk of fire.; B: Animal habitats undergo significant loss.; C: A storm surge wipes out sea turtle nests.; D: Debris creates additional habitats for mosquitoes.
A: condensation; B: evaporation; C: freezing; D: melting
A: heat their homes with wood; B: wash vegetables before cooking; C: drive gasoline-powered automobiles; D: grow flowers in the community garden
A: begin to lose some of their atomic mass.; B: break apart into individual water atoms.; C: move more freely in relation to each other.; D: release heat to the surrounding atmosphere.
A: radio tower; B: road; C: runway; D: pipeline
A: insects eating a dead tree; B: a bulldozer pushing soil; C: ice fracturing a stone; D: acid rain dissolving limestone
A: an earthquake; B: a mountain range; C: a river; D: a volcano
A: A solid dissolves in a liquid.; B: Two different substances combine.; C: A material with new properties forms.; D: The combined substances cannot be separated.
A: use the Doppler effect.; B: drive in a jet-fueled car.; C: cross Nevada's Black Desert.; D: break the sound barrier on ground.
A: 0.1 km; B: 1.5 km; C: 10 km; D: 90 km
A: change of season and fewer predators; B: change of season and less food; C: loss of habitat and fewer predators; D: loss of habitat and more food
A: Earth is closer to the Sun in summer.; B: Earth rotates at a faster rate in summer.; C: The core of Earth is closer to the surface in summer.; D: The northern half of Earth is tilted toward the Sun in summer.
A: eroded riverbanks; B: more fertile soils; C: fewer trees near rivers; D: less habitat for aquatic animals
A: 0.02 s; B: 50 s; C: 100 s; D: 200 s
A: try a different juice; B: analyze the recorded data; C: ask a scientist what went wrong; D: repeat the investigation two more times
A: Rock cools quickly from melted rock.; B: Rock is recrystallized by extreme pressure.; C: Rock solidifies slowly deep underground.; D: Rock is formed from deposited sediment.
A: start its life cycle with a fission process.; B: use its fuel source much more quickly.; C: provide more solar flares.; D: result in a nebula.
A: The population of blue flowers will increase over time.; B: The population of white flowers will increase over time.; C: The moths will start pollinating the blue flowers.; D: The bees will start pollinating the white flowers.
A: 20; B: 21; C: 41; D: 61
A: Energy from sunlight produces nutrients.; B: Nutrients increase the strength of cell walls.; C: Cells break down nutrients into usable forms.; D: Nutrients are broken down by the digestive system.
A: The current will be tripled.; B: The current will be doubled.; C: The current will be cut in half.; D: The current will stay the same.
A: It has a low pH.; B: It is unsafe to drink.; C: It is too hot to drink.; D: It contains a lot of chemicals.
A: The amount of light pollution will decrease.; B: The air conditioner at the school will run less often.; C: Fewer natural resources will be used to make electricity.; D: Money will be saved on the electricity bill for the school.
A: The old hypothesis will become obsolete.; B: The new hypothesis will be rejected due to conflict.; C: The evidence for the old hypothesis will be disregarded.; D: The evidence will be verified before the old hypothesis is revised.
A: Mg + HCl -> H_{2} + MgCl_{2}; B: H_{2}O + CO_{2} -> H_{2}CO_{3}; C: KClO_{3} -> KCl + O_{2}; D: H_{2} + O_{2} -> H_{2}O
A: sunlight; B: water; C: coal; D: copper
A: flowers; B: leaves; C: seeds; D: roots
A: carbon dioxide; B: chlorophyll; C: sugar; D: DNA
A: deer; B: wolf; C: cow; D: goat
A: The Moon is in outer space.; B: Plants make their own food.; C: The Sun revolves around Earth.; D: Paper products come from wood.
A: producer; B: decomposer; C: first-level consumer; D: second-level consumer
A: a decrease in the amount of bacteria.; B: a decrease in the amount of oxygen.; C: an increase in the water temperature.; D: an increase in the fish population.
A: Plant each field at one-year intervals.; B: Plant the grasses as close together as possible.; C: Plant all the fields at the same time, but with different types of grasses.; D: Plant warm-season grasses and cool-season grasses in each field at the same time.
A: pencil; B: computer; C: telephone; D: AM/FM radio
A: sun, water, clay, and sand.; B: sand, clay, wind, and pebbles.; C: sand, clay, dead plants, and dead animals.; D: leaves, twigs, sun, and wind.
A: to protect against disease; B: to give structural support; C: to contain the parts of the cell; D: to help with cell division
A: decreasing the potential for soil erosion.; B: increasing the food available for consumers.; C: decreasing the nutrients available for new plants.; D: increasing the accumulation of organic materials.
A: glassware used to heat liquids; B: filter paper used to filter water; C: paper towels used to soak up water; D: powdered chemicals cleaned from a spill
A: brain; B: nose; C: paws; D: muscles
A: circulatory system; B: excretory system; C: immune system; D: nervous system
A: eat less; B: hibernate; C: grow a thicker coat of fur; D: increase its body temperature
A: They release nutrients in soil.; B: They help make antibiotics.; C: They cause food to spoil.; D: They break down waste.
A: radiation; B: convection; C: conduction; D: vaporization
A: there is no control group.; B: there are too many variables.; C: there is no experimental group.; D: it does not have a testable hypothesis.
A: A football is kicked off a tee.; B: A baseball player slides into second base.; C: A floating stick is carried over a waterfall.; D: A bicycle travels faster as it goes downhill.
A: gravity; B: light; C: heat; D: air
1: 5 N; 2: 10 N; 3: 20 N; 4: 30 N
A: The color of his dog's food dish; B: The kind of food he gives his dog; C: The amount of food he gives his dog; D: The time of day he feeds his dog
A: his height; B: his scar on his right cheek; C: his intelligence; D: his ability to play the drums
A: maintaining an organized table.; B: wearing safety goggles during experiments.; C: mixing chemicals before reading instructions.; D: washing hands thoroughly after completing an experiment.
A: The winner experienced less water resistance.; B: There was more gravitational pull on the winner.; C: Friction slowed down the second place swimmer.; D: There was more force in the winner's kicks and strokes.
A: The volume of the submerged ice is equal to the volume of water displaced.; B: The mass of the water in the glass is less than the mass of the ice.; C: The weight of the ice is less than the weight of the water in the glass.; D: The density of the water in the glass is greater than the density of the ice.
A: snow; B: sand; C: grass; D: water
A: decrease in release of carbon dioxide to the atmosphere; B: increase in photosynthesis by algae in surface waters; C: increase in dissolved oxygen in surface waters; D: decrease in precipitation over ocean waters
A: erosion; B: exfoliation; C: weathering; D: sedimentation
A: repeating the experiment three times; B: experimenting with multiple substances; C: writing out the procedure after the experiment; D: using three types of thermometers in the experiment
A: making a den in the hollow of a tree; B: opening a trashcan looking for food; C: moving four legs while running; D: having a litter of four babies
A: coal; B: trees; C: water; D: wind
A: elephants stripping bark from trees; B: viruses infecting the cells of certain birds; C: beavers constructing dams to make ponds for lodges; D: semi-aquatic rodents feeding on the roots of aquatic plants
A: high altitude; B: intense pressure; C: quick cooling; D: low temperatures
A: intrusive igneous.; B: clastic sedimentary.; C: metamorphic.; D: volcanic.
A: A log rotting in a forest.; B: Water running in a stream.; C: A rock sitting in a garden.; D: Waves breaking on a beach.
A: glue; B: screws; C: nails; D: saw
A: color; B: texture; C: hardness; D: origin
A: The helium gas is more active in the winter season.; B: Air outside the balloons leaks into the balloons.; C: As the temperature increases, the helium in the balloons expands.; D: Outdoor air pressure in the summer is less than indoor air pressure.
A: automobile manufacturing; B: home building; C: landscaping; D: newspaper
A: Al_{2}O; B: Al_{2}O_{3}; C: 2AlO_{3}; D: Al_{3}O_{2}
A: Terrarium ecosystems cannot get enough sunlight.; B: Terrarium ecosystems cannot get enough oxygen.; C: Ecosystems with few species are weak and unstable.; D: All ecosystems require thoughtful human management.
A: a compound.; B: a mixture.; C: a solution.; D: an element.
A: 0.5 m/s; B: 1.0 m/s; C: 7.5 m/s; D: 30 m/s
A: record the numbers of leaves in a data table; B: photograph each leaf type using a camera; C: record the sizes of different leaves in a notebook; D: calculate the percentages of all leaf types using a calculator
A: moons, planets, and comets; B: moons, comets, and stars; C: planets, stars, and comets; D: planets, stars, and moons
A: increase amount of heating; B: increase surface area of walls; C: increase number of windows; D: increase thickness of insulation
A: research; B: interviews; C: observation; D: measurement
A: loss of a proton; B: gain of a proton; C: loss of an electron; D: gain of an electron
A: adding more fish; B: adding more plants; C: placing food in the tank; D: placing a water heater in the tank
A: observing the apple pieces; B: cutting the apple into more pieces; C: observing the color of the whole apple, then observing the color of the apple pieces; D: determining the mass of the whole apple, then determining the mass of the apple pieces
A: Erosion is slower than uplift at El Cajon Pass.; B: Plates are separating at El Cajon Pass.; C: Mountain building is slower than erosion at El Cajon Pass.; D: Erosion and uplift are balanced at El Cajon Pass.
A: They can see insects that light up at night.; B: Their bodies lose less water in the cool night air.; C: They are able to find more plant food by moonlight.; D: Their bodies absorb sunlight in the daytime while they sleep.
A: colors of its fur; B: length of its tail; C: scars on its leg; D: size of its body
A: Plants have the most biomass.; B: Plants are resistant to disease.; C: Plants are primary producers.; D: Plants are part of the food web.
A: balance; B: yardstick; C: thermometer; D: graduated cylinder
A: boiling water and melting wax; B: rusting iron and baking a cake; C: dissolving powder and shredding paper; D: freezing water and burning coal
A: 0; B: 1; C: 4; D: 7
A: It is used up by the light in the refrigerator.; B: It is released to the surroundings as heat.; C: It is converted into mechanical energy.; D: It stored as a form of potential energy.
A: mud flats; B: shallow salt lakes; C: fields of sagebrush; D: piles of rocky debris
A: fire extinguisher; B: first-aid kit; C: bottled water; D: iodine tablets
A: has a low specific heat.; B: can be changed from a liquid to a solid.; C: dissolves very few substances.; D: exists naturally in three states on Earth.
A: much hotter; B: much colder; C: above sea level; D: covered by water
A: an increase in cellular respiration which increases heat production; B: sweating from the skin to lower inner heat levels; C: opening of the capillaries in the skin to obtain more heat; D: an increase in the metabolism which decreases heat from cells
A: The man moves farther and faster than the boy.; B: The boy moves farther and faster than the man.; C: The man moves farther but the same speed as the boy.; D: The boy moves faster but the same distance as the man.
A: group 1 (1A); B: group 3 (3B); C: group 16 (6A); D: group 18 (8A)
A: Earth's crust becomes a cooler solid.; B: Earth's mantle becomes a warmer semiliquid.; C: Earth's mantle becomes cooler and solid.; D: Earth's outer core becomes warmer.
A: Meltwater decreases, and the size of the glacier decreases.; B: Meltwater decreases, and the size of the glacier increases.; C: Meltwater increases, and the size of the glacier decreases.; D: Meltwater increases, and the size of the glacier increases.
A: convection currents beneath Earth's crust.; B: the rotation of Earth on its axis.; C: the gradual sinking of Earth's crust.; D: heat from the Sun warming Earth.
A: riding a bicycle without a helmet; B: smoking cigarettes; C: wearing a hat while in the Sun; D: eating with dirty hands
A: space probe; B: space shuttle; C: space station; D: space telescope
A: C; B: NO_{2}; C: O_{2}; D: CO
A: the number of valence electrons; B: the number of protons; C: the charge of the atom; D: the size of the atom
A: its mass; B: its weight; C: its density; D: its volume
A: changing data to fit expected results; B: designing and carrying out investigations; C: formulating detailed hypotheses; D: communicating results to others
A: Thick fog develops.; B: Temperatures increase.; C: Clouds begin to form.; D: Winds die down.
A: chicken eggs hatching; B: paint fading to a lighter color; C: apples ripening on the tree; D: boulders weathering into gravel
A: the way Earth tilts on its axis; B: the way Earth rotates on its axis; C: changes in the distance between Earth and the Sun; D: changes in the amount of energy the Sun produces
A: 2 m/s; B: 5 m/s; C: 20 m/s; D: 25 m/s
A: 80 kilometers per hour; B: 90 kilometers per hour; C: 100 kilometers per hour; D: 180 kilometers per hour
A: A bulldozer pushes a pile of dirt.; B: A shoe makes a footprint in soil.; C: A tree root splits a rock in half.; D: A drill makes a hole in a board.
A: The lemonade was cooled to 100°C.; B: The lemonade was heated to 100°C.; C: The lemonade was cooled below 0°C.; D: The lemonade was heated above 0°C.
A: burn the materials in a bonfire; B: take the materials to a landfill; C: dump the materials in a trash bin; D: sort the materials by plastics, papers, and cans
A: collect samples of types of trees; B: observe and record behaviors; C: conduct experiments in a laboratory; D: change environment and observe responses
A: amoeba; B: euglena; C: skin cell; D: bacterial cell
A: Air resistance; B: The weight of the box; C: The frictional force exerted by the floor on the box; D: The gravitational force exerted by the Earth on the box
A: height.; B: mass.; C: shape.; D: weight.
A: pushing a button to make a doorbell ring; B: stepping on a mat to make a door open; C: flipping a switch to turn on a light; D: sliding a lever to turn on an electric blanket
A: a small size; B: flat, grinding teeth; C: sharp vision and hearing; D: resistance to weather changes
A: There is less rainfall in the desert.; B: Temperatures vary more in the desert.; C: There is less water vapor in the desert air.; D: There are fewer plants in the desert.
A: Fertilizers may wash into streams.; B: Fertilizers may be used by weeds.; C: Fertilizers may evaporate into the air.; D: Fertilizers may come from natural materials.
A: The average annual rainfall is 51cm.; B: The average high temperature in springtime is 22°C.; C: The average temperature Monday was 17°C.; D: The average number of sunny days per year is 285.
1: decrease; 2: increase; 3: remain the same
A: warm temperatures; B: cloudy conditions; C: clear conditions; D: cool temperatures
A: the mirror, because it is reflective; B: the piece of cardboard, because it is opaque; C: the clear window glass, because it is transparent; D: the frosted window glass, because it is translucent
A: make a graph.; B: write a report.; C: use a different procedure.; D: repeat the same procedure.
A: During a chemical reaction, the total amount of matter stays the same.; B: During a chemical reaction, matter is destroyed.; C: During a chemical reaction, one or more new substances are formed.; D: During a chemical reaction, the total number of atoms increases.
A: It allows chemicals to kill more pests.; B: It creates crops that are pest-resistant.; C: It interrupts the life cycles of pests.; D: It allows pests to overpopulate.
A: Nitrogen replaces oxygen in the water.; B: The temperature of the water increases.; C: Wave action carries away the dead algae.; D: Bottom dwellers die and fish swim away.
A: increasing the number of pollock; B: changing the diet of the sea lions; C: improving the habitats of herring; D: changing the location of the sea lions
A: It is replaced.; B: It is modified.; C: It becomes law.; D: It becomes suspect.
A: The fish and dinosaur both lived near a shoreline.; B: The fish was carried far inland by an enormous wave.; C: The fish and dinosaur were fossilized at very different times.; D: The dinosaur was swimming from one continent to another when it died.
A: rainfall.; B: animal populations.; C: the reproduction of algae.; D: the evaporation of ocean water.
A: It is an opinion and not a fact.; B: It is correct because it is based on observation.; C: It is one of several possible explanations for the evidence.; D: It is invalid because it is not based on a scientific method.
A: other support for the research study findings.; B: the way the research study was designed.; C: when the research study was done.; D: how the author feels about the research study.
A: The lower mantle is older than the upper mantle.; B: The lower mantle is cooler than the upper mantle.; C: The lower mantle is under more pressure than the upper mantle.; D: The lower mantle is farther from the core than the upper mantle.
A: The oxygen is a solution that dissolves the water.; B: The oxygen is a substance that dissolves the water.; C: The oxygen is a solute that is dissolved in the water.; D: The oxygen is a solvent that is dissolved in the water.
A: gas; B: liquid; C: solid
A: organisms may become extinct.; B: biodiversity will continue to increase.; C: more plants used for medicines can be discovered.; D: there will be an increase in the gene pool for future organisms.
A: There is little water in the atmosphere of Earth.; B: Most water on Earth is found as vapor.; C: Water exists in all three states on Earth.; D: Water on Earth tends to form a solid over time.
A: using natural gas to heat homes; B: building dams to produce electricity; C: cutting down trees to build new homes; D: recycling paper to reduce the cutting of trees
A: continued investigation; B: rejection of older hypotheses; C: progress in the scientific method; D: discussion of existing conclusions
A: using sprinklers for fewer hours each week; B: washing vehicles in the middle of the day; C: spraying water to clean oil from parking lots; D: letting faucets run while brushing teeth
A: faulting in the limestone; B: flooding of streams around the area; C: the land above the limestone to sink; D: a change in the type of rock that forms in that area
A: an observation.; B: a hypothesis.; C: a conclusion.; D: an inference.
A: The oceans absorb the energy.; B: Clouds reflect the energy into space.; C: Plants store the energy as chemicals.; D: The atmosphere is heated by the energy.
A: when Earth is between the Moon and the Sun; B: when the Moon passes between Earth and the Sun; C: when the Sun is between Earth and the Moon; D: when Earth is at a 90° angle to the Moon and the Sun
A: when tadpoles need to swim immediately; B: when there is a limited amount of water in their environment; C: when there is a decrease in the number of predators; D: when tadpoles need to blend in with their surroundings
A: date and time.; B: date and plant height.; C: plant height and soil type; D: date, plant height, and soil type.
A: meter; B: kilometer; C: millimeter; D: centimeter
A: 1.5 times; B: 2 times; C: 2.5 times; D: 3 times
A: the mass of the sample; B: the density of the sample; C: whether the sample has a fixed shape; D: whether the sample conducts electricity
A: The grass would become greener.; B: More birds would move into the fields.; C: The hawks would eat more of the grass.; D: There would be fewer sparrows seen in the fields.
A: Water molecules hitting the food coloring molecules caused the mixing.; B: Light shining on the surface of the water caused the mixing.; C: A chemical reaction between the water and the food coloring formed a new, light blue compound.; D: The water interacted with the food coloring, causing the blue color to fade.
A: A student's notebook; B: A mirror on the bus; C: A brick wall of the school; D: A student's sunglass lenses
A: They can produce their own oxygen.; B: They make their own food from sunlight.; C: They can receive nutrients through the cell wall.; D: They use mitochondria to release energy from sugars.
A: speeds up the experiment.; B: improves the reliability of the results.; C: makes the graphs easier to read.; D: ensures the students learn something.
A: air; B: iron; C: glass; D: aluminum
A: the mean number of eggs laid in a year; B: the median number of eggs laid in a year; C: the mode of the number of eggs laid in a year; D: the range of the number of eggs laid in a year
A: Include the names of the students that worked on the investigation.; B: Correctly label all the data in their charts and tables.; C: Take a picture of the students doing the study.; D: Give the report to the teacher.
A: Pour the acid into a trash can.; B: Neutralize the acid before pouring it down a sink.; C: Return the acid to the teacher's stock bottle.; D: Allow the water to evaporate from the acid solution.
A: Underground coal mining increases pollution.; B: Underground coal mining reduces habitat loss.; C: Underground coal mining increases forest growth.; D: Underground coal mining reduces animal populations.
A: use the second boiling point; B: average the two numbers; C: use the first boiling point; D: repeat the investigation
A: Element 1 is polished to form a smooth surface.; B: Element 2 is heated and evaporates.; C: Element 3 develops a white, powdery surface after standing in air.; D: Element 4 is separated from a mixture by filtration.
1: before fertilization; 2: before birth; 3: during childhood; 4: during adulthood
A: Discontinue the use of the drug.; B: Inform people of the possible side effects.; C: Reduce the amount of drug given to people.; D: Modify the drug to include medicine that prevents nausea.
A: a flood; B: a tornado; C: a hurricane; D: an earthquake
A: mass.; B: length.; C: volume.; D: temperature.
A: The original substances had different densities.; B: The contents of the beaker reacted to form a new substance.; C: The original substances had a greater mass than the contents of the beaker.; D: The contents of the beaker can be easily separated into the original substances.
A: fossils occur only in sedimentary rocks.; B: many organisms survive for millions of years.; C: fossils do not undergo chemical or physical weathering.; D: different organisms usually inhabit specific environments.
A: heat energy; B: kinetic energy; C: chemical energy; D: mechanical energy
A: She has a desirable trait.; B: She has had other offspring.; C: She has recovered from an illness.; D: She has donated other tissues successfully.
A: 1.0 g; B: 1.5 g; C: 148.5 g; D: 298.5 g
A: The temperature is lower in the valley than on the mountain top.; B: The temperature is higher in the valley than on the mountain top.; C: Air pressure in the valley is lower than on the mountain top.; D: Air pressure in the valley is higher than on the mountain top.
1: plentiful resources; 2: stable climate; 3: more predators; 4: less competition
A: inquiring into the causes of observed phenomena; B: finding options for replacing missing wavelengths of light; C: health concerns about the effects of ultraviolet radiation; D: predicting future changes in ultraviolet light output
A: flat sheet will fall on its edge; B: both will fall at the same rate; C: crumpled sheet will fall faster; D: crumpled sheet will move horizontally
A: sugar dissolving in tea; B: sunshine warming a sidewalk; C: scissors cutting paper into pieces; D: acid in the stomach digesting food
A: fertilization; B: germination; C: maturation; D: sexual reproduction
A: Buds form, flowers open, fruits grow; B: Flowers die, fruits grow, buds form; C: Seeds drop, flowers open, buds form; D: Seeds drop, flowers die, fruits grow
A: A solution is a mixture whose components are similar throughout.; B: A solution is the liquid product of a chemical reaction.; C: A solution is formed by the combination of two or more liquids.; D: A solution consists of two components with different volumes.
1: move slower; 2: move faster; 3: move at the same speed; 4: stop moving
A: to decompose.; B: to pollinate flowers.; C: to recycle nutrients in the soil.; D: to collect acorns and bury them in the soil.
A: Ocean water is salty.; B: There are mountain ranges on the ocean floor.; C: About 97 percent of Earth's water is ocean water.; D: Fewer clouds block sunlight over the ocean.
A: comes in colors.; B: has a smoother appearance.; C: creates less pollution.; D: reduces the number of trees cut down.
A: number of kilowatts produced per home; B: the effect of warmed water on aquatic life; C: the impact of other energy-producing resources; D: energy use per person
A: because it forms where fresh and salt water meet; B: because it receives water directly from precipitation; C: because it rises to the surface near the ocean; D: because pollutants are filtered by rock and soil deep within Earth
A: Drop each object in different liquids.; B: Record in a table how each object behaves.; C: Measure the length and mass of each object.; D: Test the objects in groups from smallest to largest.
A: moist skin; B: tube-like body; C: skin that breathes; D: very small mouth
A: line graph; B: pie chart; C: bar graph; D: data table
1: decrease the temperature of the water; 2: use larger pieces of sugar; 3: stir rapidly; 4: use less water
A: A car's gas mileage is increased and the engine has less power.; B: An airplane uses a more efficient engine and has higher performance.; C: A sports drink's taste is improved and has the same nutritional content.; D: A computer company upgrades the hardware and the price remains unchanged.
A: by writing a post to an astronomy-based science blog; B: by sending an article to a peer-reviewed astronomy journal; C: by creating a personal webpage that is focused on astronomy; D: by discussing the data with a reporter who understands astronomy
A: erosion of cliffs.; B: water flowing into a lake.; C: dams being built by beavers.; D: sediment being moved downstream by water.
A: It is an indication of a future weather condition.; B: It is an indication of the amount of humidity.; C: It is an indication of weather at a specific time.; D: It is an indication of the existing climate.
A: Gulf sturgeons will change over time into a new species.; B: Gulf sturgeons will move from coastal rivers into the ocean.; C: The gulf sturgeon population will decline due to loss of habitat.; D: The gulf sturgeon population will adapt to breeding in saltwater.
A: the time of year it was born; B: the type of food the bird eats; C: the bird's migratory patterns; D: what the bird inherited from its parents
A: common forces; B: natural cycles; C: states of matter; D: forms of energy
A: aeration; B: coagulation; C: disinfection; D: reverse osmosis
A: Scientists preferred newer models.; B: New evidence caused revisions.; C: The newer models were easier to draw.; D: The information was finally put in books.
A: a decrease in livable habitat; B: a decrease in the normal temperature; C: an increase in the amount of prey available; D: an increase in the amount of competitors for food
A: gene mutation.; B: an allergic reaction.; C: tissue overgrowth.; D: foreign cell invasion.
A: It is 18 cm tall.; B: It produces spores.; C: It grows in poor soil.; D: It has a flat gametophyte.
A: The molecules inside the balloon lost energy to the outside.; B: The molecules inside the balloon gained energy from the heat.; C: The energy of the molecules inside the balloon remained the same.; D: The molecules inside the balloon were escaping outside.
A: different from the traits of the single parent; B: the same traits as the single parent; C: different from the traits of two parents; D: similar traits as two parents
A: They are safer for the environment.; B: They are cheaper to develop.; C: They are easier to transport.; D: They produce more energy.
A: know how deep the river got when it rained.; B: know how far the river bed is from a town.; C: have accurate notes describing the location.; D: have the weather records for the past few months.
A: The grasshopper is pretty.; B: The grasshopper is dangerous.; C: The grasshopper is better than a spider.; D: The grasshopper is smaller than the leaf.
A: The skin transports oxygen.; B: The skin digests viruses.; C: The skin sends messages to the brain.; D: The skin stabilizes temperature.
A: fueling a car with gas; B: heating a house with oil; C: flying a kite in the wind; D: grilling food over charcoal
A: Taste and smell; B: Touch and sight; C: Sight and hearing; D: Smell and hearing
A: Count the number of whiteflies on the peppers before and after planting marigolds.; B: Count the number of whiteflies on the marigolds near the peppers.; C: Kill the whiteflies on other plants in the garden except on the peppers.; D: Put whiteflies on other garden plants and see what happens.
A: fur and claws; B: dry skin and scales; C: wings, feathers, and claws; D: scales, moist skin, and fins
A: produce food.; B: pass genetic information.; C: move through the body.; D: use energy.
A: acceptable if the sediments are also identified by particle size; B: acceptable if the factors used for the classification are given; C: unacceptable because others would not understand the classification system; D: unacceptable because this is not the way scientists usually classify sediments
A: wind energy; B: solar energy; C: fossil fuel energy; D: geothermal energy
A: includes many steps.; B: is recorded by a team of scientists.; C: includes repeated trials.; D: is performed in a laboratory.
A: photosynthesis; B: nitrogen fixation; C: sulfur reduction; D: aerobic respiration
A: stomach; B: brain; C: skin; D: liver
A: cut several holes in it.; B: attach small weights to it.; C: cut it into a smaller shape.; D: replace it with a thin sheet of copper.
A: It is a good conductor.; B: It is a poor conductor.; C: It is highly magnetic.; D: It is nonmagnetic.
A: is a hard mineral.; B: was once a liquid.; C: is an igneous rock.; D: contains air pockets.
A: Add fertilizer to the soil.; B: Water the garden more often.; C: Plant different vegetables in the garden.; D: Observe the plants to identify the source of the damage.
A: sleeping; B: breathing; C: jumping rope; D: digesting food
A: reactant; B: product; C: solute; D: solvent
A: heating the water before it is frozen; B: adding salt to the water before it is frozen; C: changing the amount of water to be frozen; D: changing the container for the water to be frozen in
A: number lines; B: random numbers; C: dependent variables; D: independent variables
A: compaction and cementation; B: heating and pressure; C: melting and cooling; D: uplift and erosion
A: a straw in the water.; B: clear plastic wrap around the glass.; C: a thermometer in the water.; D: black material around the glass.
A: Water can change phase.; B: Water can be absorbed by plants.; C: Water is important in chemical reactions.; D: Water is the universal solvent.
A: Earth revolves around the Sun.; B: Earth rotates on its axis.; C: The Sun rotates on its axis.; D: The Moon revolves around Earth.
A: Both are soft.; B: Both have thorns.; C: Both support the plant.; D: Both have woody bark.
A: large, arid desert; B: deep, bowl-shaped lake; C: long crack in the ground; D: volcanic mountain range
A: two dimensional representation of a one dimensional surface.; B: two dimensional representation of a three dimensional surface.; C: one dimensional representation of a two dimensional surface.; D: three dimensional representation of a two dimensional surface.
A: neutrons; B: electrons; C: protons; D: nucleus
A: 6.45 J/(g °C); B: 6.45 J; C: 16.1 J/(g °C); D: 16.1 J
A: Biodiversity would decrease, and sustainability would decrease.; B: Biodiversity would decrease, and sustainability would increase.; C: Biodiversity would increase, and sustainability would increase.; D: Biodiversity would increase, and sustainability would decrease.
A: The temperature of the water remains constant.; B: The pressure acting on the water remains constant.; C: The number of atoms in the water remains constant.; D: The distance between water molecules remains constant.
A: duplicating the results of an experiment; B: revising the original hypothesis; C: developing a theory based on the data; D: changing the experimental procedures
A: The total mass increases.; B: The total mass decreases.; C: The total mass remains the same.; D: Part of the mass is changed to heat energy.
A: telephone; B: microscope; C: phonograph; D: microphone
A: the list of energy-saving tips to follow; B: the outdoor temperature in November; C: the amount of time given to the investigation; D: the accuracy of the October and November bills
A: 666 W; B: 133 W; C: 66 W; D: 7 W
A: 50 protons, 69 electrons, 50 neutrons; B: 50 protons, 50 electrons, 69 neutrons; C: 69 protons, 50 electrons, 69 neutrons; D: 69 protons, 69 electrons, 50 neutrons
A: DNA is made up of nucleic acids.; B: Protein is made up of amino acids.; C: Nucleic acids are made up of DNA.; D: Amino acids are made up of protein.
A: pathogenic fungi; B: insect defoliation; C: soil chemical stress; D: microorganism activity
A: 0%; B: 25%; C: 50%; D: 100%
A: xylem and phloem; B: pollen and ovule; C: epidermis and mesophyll; D: pith and cambium
A: Pluto; B: Saturn; C: the Sun; D: the Moon
A: The pull of Earth's gravity; B: The pull of Earth's rotation; C: The push of the table; D: The push of air pressure
A: air; B: water; C: a rock; D: a worm
A: salt water changes coral into fossils.; B: the reefs formed in a freshwater lake.; C: the sea level has changed over time.; D: coral reefs can form on dry land.
A: closer together than air molecules.; B: more easily moved than air molecules.; C: moving faster than air molecules.; D: larger than air molecules.
A: a lipid in a membrane; B: an enzyme in a lysosome; C: a polysaccharide in a cell wall; D: a DNA molecule in a mitochondrion
A: depleting the ozone layer; B: burning gasoline in car engines; C: throwing trash out of car windows; D: allowing runoff from agricultural fields
A: artificial.; B: renewable.; C: inexhaustible.; D: nonrenewable.
A: color; B: flexibility; C: mass; D: size
A: oil; B: coal; C: trees; D: natural gas
A: hold a lamp near the floor; B: turn off the lights in the room; C: sit close to the wall near a window; D: stand between a light and the wall
A: silt.; B: clay.; C: sand.; D: humus.
A: artificial substances that mimic human peptides; B: antibiotics that can be absorbed through the skin; C: bacteria that attack antibiotic-resistant organisms; D: antibiotics that adapt in response to bacterial immunity
A: an increase in the time needed for transporting wood.; B: safer work environments for loggers.; C: a change in the chemical and physical makeup of land and water.; D: a decrease in the cost of wood and paper products.
A: amino acid; B: glucose; C: glycerol; D: carbon dioxide
A: adjust the height of the pan; B: move all of the riders to zero; C: move the beams rapidly up and down; D: adjust the location of the mass markings
A: yellow; B: blue; C: orange; D: green
A: young plant -> seed -> adult plant; B: seed -> adult plant -> young plant; C: adult plant -> young plant -> seed; D: seed -> young plant -> adult plant
A: are in the same period.; B: are in the same family.; C: have the same number of electrons.; D: have the same atomic mass number.
1: recycle materials; 2: improve safety; 3: produce chemicals; 4: conserve resources
A: Ocean waves move more easily than continental rock.; B: The oceans contain a wider variety of organisms than the continents.; C: The oceans store and transfer more heat than the continents.; D: Ocean water contains more salt than most continental lake water.
A: All of the fossils were found in the same layers of rocks as horse fossils.; B: All of the fossils are completely identical to horse bones.; C: All of the fossils show similar structures to that of the modern horse.; D: All of the fossils were located in the same place on Earth as horses.
A: a tornado; B: a flood; C: a landslide; D: an earthquake
A: leaf shape; B: flower color; C: plant height; D: survival rate
A: shelter; B: pollination; C: seed dispersal; D: sunlight
A: steam turning into water.; B: water turning into steam.; C: ice turning into water.; D: water turning into ice.
A: chemical -> mechanical -> heat; B: mechanical -> heat -> chemical; C: heat -> mechanical -> chemical; D: mechanical -> nuclear -> heat
A: increased friction; B: greater momentum; C: greater acceleration; D: more constant velocity
A: heat the mixture; B: filter the mixture; C: pour water into the mixture; D: pull a magnet through the mixture
A: Tie back long hair.; B: Refrigerate all chemicals.; C: Label all test tubes and bottles correctly.; D: Dispose of extinguished matches properly.
A: Conformity of Earlobe Types; B: Earlobe Type and Biology; C: Heredity of Earlobe Types; D: Earlobe Type and Protein Formation
A: Wind and rain destroy wheat plants.; B: The Sun's energy helps a wheat plant grow.; C: A forest is cleared to make space to plant wheat.; D: A wheat plant's seeds are scattered by the wind.
A: economic; B: biological; C: ethical; D: practical
A: The college could build an additional parking lot, gather parking data, and then receive input from community meetings.; B: The college could limit access to parking lots during busy hours, hire security officers to help restrict parking, and then gather parking data.; C: The college could gather parking data, receive input from community meetings, build an additional parking lot, and then gather more parking data.; D: The college could hire security officers to help restrict parking, gather parking data, receive input from community meetings, and then gather more data.
A: group 1 (1A); B: group 4 (4A); C: group 11 (1B); D: group 17 (7A)
1: the arrival of an air mass; 2: a severe earthquake; 3: a high ocean tide; 4: an eclipse of the Moon
A: absorb water; B: make food; C: provide support; D: attract pollinators
A: eyespot; B: cell wall; C: chloroplast; D: central vacuole
A: new plant growth; B: changing of the seasons; C: cutting down trees to build houses; D: planting pine seedlings
A: carbon dioxide; B: nitrogen; C: sodium chloride; D: sugar
A: ice forming on a lake; B: dew forming on grass; C: snow melting into a puddle; D: water evaporating from a pond
A: coral reef; B: high desert; C: oceanic trench; D: evergreen forest
A: Earth.; B: the Moon.; C: the galaxy.; D: the Sun.
A: time to roll down the ramp; B: mass of the ball; C: diameter of the ball; D: kind of surface on the ramp
A: carbon deposits.; B: volcanic materials.; C: strike-slip faults.; D: bowl-shaped craters.
A: fossils are preserved in different ways.; B: conclusions about fossils are revised into questions.; C: fossils are formed in different areas.; D: new fossil evidence is reviewed.
A: One girl will pull the other toward her.; B: Both girls will stay in the same place.; C: Gravity will cause the rope to sag.; D: The rope will break.
A: electrical to sound; B: light to electrical; C: heat to mechanical; D: mechanical to sound
A: rate of rotation.; B: extreme temperature.; C: amount of pressure.; D: magnetic field.
A: Television manufacturing uses many toxic chemicals.; B: The ads on television show many popular toys that kids want.; C: Television provides information about current weather conditions.; D: The electricity used to run televisions is one use of natural resources.
A: the Theory of Biological Evolution; B: the Law of Superposition; C: the Theory of Geological Evolution; D: the Theory of Continental Drift
A: 3; B: 5; C: 8; D: 15
A: needed increased resources.; B: had access to advanced technology.; C: had unlimited financial resources.; D: needed to ease social pressures.
A: Gas; B: Solid; C: Liquid; D: Plasma
A: They can be solids, liquids, or gases.; B: They come in different sizes and shapes.; C: They combine in different numbers and ratios.; D: They can be a proton, a neutron, or an electron.
A: The climate and geology of this area have changed over time.; B: These creatures were better adapted to cold climates at one time.; C: The process of fossilization greatly changed the original material.; D: Scavengers carried the remains of these creatures to higher regions.
A: liters; B: grams; C: degrees; D: centimeters
A: a trial; B: a result; C: a variable; D: a hypothesis
A: The metal rod becomes a liquid.; B: The metal rod becomes heavier.; C: The metal rod attracts other metals.; D: The metal rod produces sound.
A: owls looking for food at night; B: monarch butterflies migrating south; C: cats pawing the area where they are going to sleep; D: fish swimming to the top of an aquarium to get food
A: CO_{2}; B: NO_{2}; C: O_{2}; D: N_{2}
A: in a desert; B: along a river; C: at the bottom of an ocean; D: in the middle of a prairie
A: infrared heat energy; B: visible light energy; C: chemical energy; D: electrical energy
A: a physical change because the iron reacted with the sulfur; B: a chemical change because a new substance was formed; C: a physical change because a compound was formed; D: a chemical change because a magnet had to be used
A: 1.6; B: 2.3; C: 7.0; D: 11.2
A: using a fork to eat; B: jumping at a loud noise; C: squinting in a bright light; D: sneezing when smelling a flower
A: It enhanced recreational and diving opportunities.; B: It enhanced the studying of corals and other organisms.; C: It increased over-fishing and destruction of ecosystems.; D: It increased the number of fish and other aquatic organisms.
A: dairy(pH 5-7); B: water (pH 6-7); C: citrus fruit (pH 2-3); D: baking soda (pH 8-9)
A: a boulder sitting on a cliff; B: a person running around a track; C: a car being driven up a hill and being parked; D: a rubber band being stretched and being broken
A: are composed of many stars.; B: have a clockwise spin.; C: are irregularly shaped.; D: have the same number of stars.
A: prevents sediment from flowing downstream.; B: increases the amount of water available to farms.; C: prevents seasonal downstream flooding.; D: increases the rate of water loss from a lake.
A: frying an egg; B: boiling water; C: breaking a glass cup; D: crushing a piece of bread
A: chemical energy into sound energy; B: chemical energy into radiant energy; C: electrical energy into nuclear energy; D: electrical energy into mechanical energy
A: Release sterile moths to limit reproduction.; B: Use widespread spraying of insecticides.; C: Introduce a predator of the cacti.; D: Stop importation of all types of plants.
A: The speed was constant.; B: The velocity was constant.; C: The speed was always changing.; D: The velocity was always changing.
A: plastic yogurt container.; B: clearly labeled glass jar.; C: paper orange juice container.; D: green plastic soda bottle.
A: latex gloves; B: a glass test tube; C: a mixture of water and sugar; D: a paper towel used to clean up
A: How much space does a plant need to grow?; B: How much soil does a plant need to grow?; C: How much water will make a plant grow tallest?; D: How much sunlight will make a plant grow tallest?
A: It is soft.; B: It is blue.; C: It is square.; D: It is smooth.
A: amount of neutrons; B: number of electrons; C: size of protons and neutrons; D: size of electrons and electron cloud
A: day and night; B: stormy weather; C: high and low tide; D: season changes
A: Squirrel; B: Sea gull; C: Cricket; D: Lizard
A: condensation; B: evaporation; C: radiation; D: vaporization
A: Earth to be warmer at night.; B: Earth to rotate more rapidly.; C: the Moon to shine more brightly than other objects in the sky.; D: the Moon to appear as different shapes during the month.
A: The air stays cleaner.; B: Cars can travel at faster speeds.; C: The skills of the drivers improve.; D: It becomes safer to drive on the roads.
A: two 2g objects 2 meters apart; B: two 2g objects 4 meters apart; C: two 1g objects 6 meters apart; D: two 1g objects 8 meters apart
A: volvox; B: amoeba; C: euglena; D: paramecium
A: A paramecium does not live where there is light.; B: A paramecium does not photosynthesize its own food.; C: A paramecium lives in shallower water than a euglena.; D: A paramecium uses cilia instead of a flagellum to move.
A: The eruption intensified the greenhouse effect.; B: Lava flow from the eruption caused a temporary increase in Earth's total heat energy.; C: The eruption caused damage to the ozone layer.; D: Air pollution from the eruption caused a decrease in the amount of solar energy reaching Earth.
A: a salt marsh; B: a frozen plain; C: a sandy beach; D: a humid rainforest
A: oil; B: coal; C: natural gas; D: water
A: a disruption in the homeostasis of the deer; B: a change in the genetic makeup of the deer; C: an increase in the energy level of the deer; D: an increase in the reproductive rate of the deer
A: seas that have evaporated.; B: natural gas subjected to heat.; C: melted and cooled metamorphic rock.; D: plant remains decomposed under pressure.
A: The substances became cooler and expanded.; B: The substances physically changed the plastic.; C: The substances became warm and stretched the bag.; D: The substances chemically reacted and produced a gas.
A: carpooling to work; B: composting grass clippings; C: using a solar-powered calculator; D: watering the lawn in the morning
A: Red; B: Black; C: White; D: Yellow
A: the speed; B: the position; C: the direction; D: the acceleration
A: Coral reefs formed from calcium carbonate.; B: Coal formed from plants that lived long ago.; C: Limestone rocks quarried at Earth's surface.; D: Carbohydrates stored in fruits and vegetables.
A: the soil; B: the water; C: the plants; D: the sunlight
A: by using up heat energy stored in Earth's core; B: by releasing excess energy from the interior of the earth; C: by using up large volumes of nearby atmospheric oxygen; D: by releasing dust that blocks sunlight from reaching Earth
A: within three generations.; B: over a long period of time.; C: when a species is overpopulated.; D: when there are abundant resources.
A: 0.75 m/h; B: 20 m/s; C: 80 m/h; D: 1,200 m/h
A: 5 m/s; B: 50 m/s; C: 100 m/s; D: 300 m/s
A: a sheet of rubber; B: a sheet of paper; C: a sheet of metal; D: a sheet of wood
A: Medium spiders will be the most plentiful.; B: Large spiders will learn to hide from predators.; C: Small and medium spiders will be the least plentiful.; D: Small and large spiders will mutate.
A: A nail is left outside and it rusts.; B: A glass is dropped and it shatters into small pieces.; C: A rubber band is stretched until it breaks.; D: A pencil is sharpened to a point.
A: 18 kilometers; B: 9 kilometers; C: 4.5 kilometers; D: 3.3 kilometers
A: production of sperm and egg; B: joining of sperm and egg; C: division of egg; D: development of embryo
A: It opens the circuit.; B: It creates the electric field.; C: It controls the amount of current.; D: It provides energy to the circuit.
A: precipitation; B: cloud cover; C: wind direction; D: air pressure
A: a 50 mL beaker; B: a 50 mL graduated cylinder; C: a 500 mL beaker; D: a 500 mL graduated cylinder
A: cool off.; B: stay hidden.; C: attract mates.; D: protect skin.
A: a pie chart with four different sections; B: a line graph with continuous data points; C: a bar graph with a bar for each trial; D: a table with four rows and four columns
A: prophase; B: anaphase; C: metaphase; D: telophase
A: density; B: mass; C: shape; D: volume
A: the radiation that is present in the star; B: the amount of energy the star consumes; C: the quantity of mass with which the star began; D: the location of the star in the universe
A: a mutation in a parent's body cell; B: a mutation in a parent's sex cell; C: the natural selection of a trait; D: the artificial selection of a trait
A: igneous rock; B: extrusive rock; C: sedimentary rock; D: metamorphic rock
A: Copper is a good conductor of electricity.; B: Copper mixed with silver is expensive.; C: Copper can be pounded into many shapes.; D: Copper is an excellent conductor of heat.
A: The population expands and competition intensifies.; B: Competition strengthens while the population contracts.; C: The population increases as competition decreases.; D: Competition weakens and the population decreases.
A: ranked by number of centimeters of snow per day; B: arranged according to the cause of the snowfall; C: ordered by how long the snow remained on the ground; D: matched with air temperature at time of the snowfall
A: use bees to pollinate the flowers; B: reproduce by cross-pollination of different peach trees; C: increase the diversity in the peach tree; D: ensure that the peach tree reproduces asexually
A: lake; B: river; C: aquifer; D: wetland
A: natural selection; B: defense mechanism; C: structural adaptation; D: behavioral adaptation
A: the size of the insect and the number of legs; B: the name of the insect and the location found; C: the weight of the insect and the time it was collected; D: the color of the insect and the number of body segments
A: when the river flow is low and the tide is low; B: when the river flow is high and the tide is low; C: when the river flow is low and the tide is high; D: when the river flow is high and the tide is high
A: Purple martins will increase and starlings will decrease.; B: Purple martins will increase and starlings will increase.; C: Purple martins will decrease and starlings will decrease.; D: Purple martins will decrease and starlings will increase.
A: shape; B: length; C: mass; D: width
A: Nitrogen (N_{2}); B: Neon (Ne); C: Ozone (O_{3}); D: Ammonia (NH_{3})
A: use equal masses of baking soda and vinegar; B: determine the masses of all the substances before and after the reaction; C: determine the mass of the carbon dioxide and water that is produced; D: compare the mass of the vinegar and water to be certain they are
A: crystallization from melted rock; B: formation of sediment from weathering; C: deposition and burial of dead plant matter; D: eruption of volcanic ash followed by settling in a layer
A: 12.5 years; B: 125 years; C: 125,000 years; D: 125,000,000 years
A: space flight; B: genetic modification; C: alternative energy; D: hurricane forecasting
A: physical property.; B: chemical property.; C: chemical change.; D: physical change.
A: breaking an object into smaller pieces by using a hammer; B: allowing an iron chain to remain in salt water until it rusts; C: heating a brown substance until it changes into a gray powder; D: reacting vinegar and baking soda to make white foam and a gas
A: Insects eat the leaves of a plant for food.; B: Flowers grow after a summer rain shower.; C: Earthworms loosen soil as they travel through it.; D: Leaves convert sunlight to sugar by photosynthesis.
A: 24; B: 28; C: 48; D: 52
A: stiff; B: flexible; C: brittle; D: hard
A: To absorb light energy and manufacture food; B: To remove waste materials by active transport; C: To manufacture chemical energy from food; D: To control the shape of the cell
A: absorbed by the carpet.; B: refracted by the carpet.; C: reflected by the carpet.; D: amplified by the carpet.
A: It keeps kitchens cooler in the summer.; B: It provides more space for food storage.; C: It makes food safer to eat for longer periods.; D: It makes electricity safer to use in the kitchen.
A: large fruits; B: long stems; C: sharp thorns; D: colorful flowers
A: oxygen and nitrogen in air; B: sodium and chlorine in salt; C: hydrogen and oxygen in water; D: nitrogen and hydrogen in ammonia
A: sulfur (S); B: argon (Ar); C: fluorine (F); D: bromine (Br)
A: a chemist; B: a biologist; C: a geologist; D: a physician
A: engine and carburetor.; B: wheels and axles.; C: brakes and muffler.; D: steering wheel and speedometer.
A: Evidence that his claim is correct; B: Evidence that his claim is wrong; C: Proof that there is going to be a hard winter; D: Neither proof nor disproof for his claim
A: increasing the mass of the box; B: decreasing the length of the ramp; C: decreasing the steepness of the ramp; D: increasing the friction on the surface of the box
A: a hill and a delta; B: a delta and a canyon; C: a canyon and a dune; D: a dune and a delta
A: Identify the problem, evaluate the solution, explore possible solutions, and select a solution.; B: Identify the problem, explore possible solutions, select a solution, and evaluate the solution.; C: Identify the problem, select a solution, explore possible solutions, and evaluate the solution.; D: Identify the problem, evaluate the solution, select a solution, and explore possible solutions.
A: commensalism, mutualism, parasitism, predation; B: parasitism, commensalism, predation, mutualism; C: predation, parasitism, commensalism, mutualism; D: mutualism, commensalism, parasitism, predation
A: start the experiment at the same time.; B: have different members record results.; C: use the same equipment and procedures.; D: perform a different number of trials.
A: condensation; B: erosion; C: evaporation; D: precipitation
A: The warm air radiates and becomes cool again.; B: The warm air evaporates into the cooler air.; C: The warm air expands and rises, resulting in convection.; D: The warm air loses its ability to hold water and precipitates.
A: sexual reproduction; B: specialized cells; C: organ systems; D: waste production
A: takes less force to move something heavy; B: changes the weight of something heavy; C: improves the way something looks; D: lets something become a different shape
A: oxygen; B: nitrogen; C: carbon dioxide; D: carbon monoxide
A: Decomposers use sunlight to make food.; B: Decomposers are a food source for plants.; C: Decomposers break down dead plants and animals.; D: Decomposers only eat plants that grow underground.
A: in the direction of moisture only; B: in the direction of the pull of gravity only; C: in the direction of water and the pull of gravity; D: in the direction of water and away from the pull of gravity
1: A piece of paper is torn in half.; 2: Warmed air rises above a lit candle.; 3: A metal spoon gets warm when used to stir hot soup.; 4: Sunlight brightens a dark room.
A: The needle is measuring the air temperature.; B: The needle is showing the direction of the wind.; C: The needle is lining up with Earth's magnetic poles.; D: The needle is pointing to the magnetic core of Earth.
A: deposition in water; B: slow cooling and crystallization; C: weathering and erosion; D: exposure to heat and high pressure
A: 6:00 A.M.; B: 10:00 A.M.; C: 1:00 P.M.; D: 3:00 P.M.
A: chloroplast and mitochondrion; B: mitochondrion and cell wall; C: chloroplast and nucleus; D: nucleus and cell wall
A: sweat glands; B: nerves; C: hairs; D: nails
A: The atoms stop moving.; B: The atoms recycle back into the environment.; C: The atoms split into simpler parts and then combine to form other atoms.; D: The atoms no longer exist once the animal has decomposed.
A: growth; B: dormancy; C: hibernation; D: metamorphosis
A: a diagram of a river food web; B: a graph of the amount of rainfall on a lake; C: a picture of fog covering a mountain valley; D: a model of a stream flowing down a hillside
A: birds flying south in the winter; B: plants flowering in the summer; C: trees losing their leaves in the fall; D: earthworms living underground all year
A: the hot water was poured in too slowly; B: the hot water evaporated too slowly; C: the glass contracted too quickly; D: the glass expanded too rapidly
A: a parasitic infection; B: a mutation in DNA; C: a bacterial disease; D: an excess of ATP
A: landing a human on Mars; B: using solar power to produce electricity; C: replacing human body parts with artificial parts; D: using DNA to identify a criminal
A: skin.; B: lungs.; C: kidneys.; D: large intestine.
A: the mass of Earth.; B: the rotation of Earth.; C: the revolution of Earth.; D: weather patterns on Earth.
A: less than 1/4; B: about 1/2; C: about 3/4; D: almost all
A: disinfectant; B: suntan lotion; C: safety goggles; D: ear protectors
A: photosynthesis; B: muscular movement; C: bioluminescence; D: nerve impulse transfer
A: prepare a conclusion; B: ask a question; C: conduct the experiment; D: choose the correct equipment
A: barometer and wind vane; B: wind vane and anemometer; C: thermometer and barometer; D: anemometer and thermometer
A: fewer predators of bison.; B: many other large grazing animals.; C: tall shrubs and many trees.; D: less grass and more bare soil.
A: more aquatic life; B: less nutrients in the water; C: higher water temperatures; D: fewer nitrates
A: Oxygen and sugar are used in the process that provides energy to cells; water and carbon dioxide are its waste products.; B: Water and sugar are used to in the process that provides energy to cells; oxygen and carbon dioxide are its waste products.; C: Oxygen and carbon dioxide are used in the process that provides energy to cells; sugar and water are its waste products.; D: Carbon dioxide and sugar are used in the process that provides energy to cells; water and oxygen are its waste products.
A: mass.; B: speed.; C: net force.; D: rate of rotation.
A: cooking sugar on a stove; B: pouring sugar through a screen; C: dissolving a sugar cube in water; D: crushing a sugar cube into pieces
A: insect bites.; B: contaminated food.; C: genetically from parents.; D: pathogens in the air.
A: Turn away after two or three minutes.; B: Look at the Sun through a long telescope.; C: Cast an image through a pinhole onto a screen.; D: Blink often until your eyes get used to the light.
A: genetic mutation; B: selective breeding; C: genome duplicating; D: sexual recombination
A: It absorbs all the white light and turns most of it into blue light.; B: It reflects the blue part of the light and absorbs most of the rest.; C: It absorbs only the blue part of the light.; D: It gives off its own blue light.
A: condensation; B: transportation; C: evaporation; D: accumulation
A: protein; B: peptide; C: nucleic acid; D: carbohydrate
A: They break down when reacting with acids.; B: They can be altered with an electric current.; C: They are always metals.; D: They cannot be divided into smaller substances.
A: turning off lights; B: using public transportation; C: throwing away aluminum cans; D: opening windows to cool a house
A: heart, blood, vessels; B: nose, trachea, lungs; C: brain, spinal cord, nerves; D: esophagus, stomach, intestines
A: two or more combined elements; B: the smallest units of an element; C: particles inside a nucleus; D: different forms of an element
A: Fish have a two-chambered heart.; B: Some fish are much larger than others.; C: Fish need different amounts of oxygen.; D: There are six types of fish in the aquarium.
A: friction from the atmosphere; B: the velocity of the shuttle; C: the mass of the shuttle; D: gravity from Earth
A: multiple alleles; B: incomplete dominance; C: homozygous recessive; D: heterozygous dominant
A: cloth fibers; B: oxygen gas; C: saltwater; D: snowflakes
A: Earth rotates on its axis.; B: Earth revolves around the sun.; C: The stars are moving through space.; D: The gravity of the moon attracts the stars.
A: The tail grows and the gills disappear.; B: The gills develop and the front legs appear.; C: The rear legs grow and the lungs disappear.; D: The lungs develop and the tail becomes shorter.
A: birds building a nest in a bush; B: worms eating the roots of a plant; C: squirrels burying seeds from a tree; D: deer scraping their antlers on a tree
A: rate of erosion; B: plant diversity; C: animal activity; D: thickness of soil
A: feet; B: meters; C: miles; D: kilometers
A: 23; B: 43; C: 63; D: 83 331
A: How long will the dirt stay wet?; B: What types of animals live in the dirt?; C: Will adding more water change the type of dirt?; D: Do different types of dirt wash away at different rates?
A: The Moon is made of hot gases.; B: The Moon is covered with many craters.; C: The Moon has many bodies of liquid water.; D: The Moon has the ability to give off its own light.
A: 750 N; B: 1500 N; C: 3000 N; D: 6000 N
A: Earth turns so the stars seem to move.; B: Some stars only shine for a few hours each night.; C: The star must have burned up.; D: Some stars move faster than others.
A: Some multicellular organisms are plants.; B: Most organisms are multicellular.; C: Some multicellular organisms are poisonous.; D: Most multicellular organisms are dangerous.
A: thermal; B: solar; C: mechanical; D: chemical
A: a glass bottle; B: a reusable cup; C: a paper carton; D: a disposable bottle
A: condense; B: evaporate; C: remain a liquid; D: become a solid
A: March; B: June; C: September; D: December
A: produce greenhouse gases.; B: produce water pollution.; C: are expensive to operate.; D: are expensive to purchase.
A: Recycle the old ammonia bottle.; B: Label the new container clearly.; C: Heat the new container to seal the lid.; D: Store the new container in the refrigerator.
A: oxygen; B: carbon dioxide; C: iron sulfide; D: glucose
A: a decrease in daylight hours; B: an increase in air temperature; C: an increase in precipitation; D: a decrease in air pressure
A: height; B: weight; C: skin color; D: eye color
A: The temperature of the magnesium ribbon increased.; B: The shape of the magnesium ribbon changed.; C: The burning magnesium produced light.; D: The magnesium appeared to evaporate.
A: It has a definite volume and takes the shape of its container.; B: It has an indefinite volume and takes the shape of its container.; C: It has a definite volume, and its shape is independent of its container.; D: It has an indefinite volume, and its shape is independent of its container.
A: Earth is somewhat flattened at the Poles due to its rotation.; B: The continents are thick rock masses, unlike the ocean floors.; C: Earth has a solid spherical inner core that is mostly iron.; D: Earth's plates are constantly moving at a very slow rate.
A: the length of the boat; B: the height of sides of the boat; C: the weight of the rowers in the boat; D: the number of people rowing in the boat
A: trend toward increased crust movement over time.; B: series of events that happens quickly.; C: continuing long-term process.; D: process that has a predictable pattern.
A: has large oil reserves.; B: reaches deep into Earth.; C: is rich in precious metals.; D: is heated by nearby magma.
A: during the winter near the equator; B: during the summer near the equator; C: during the winter near the North Pole; D: during the summer near the North Pole
A: one sample on one rainy day.; B: one sample a day on several rainy days.; C: several separate samples on one rainy day.; D: several separate samples on several rainy days.
A: glaciers.; B: mountains.; C: natural gas.; D: limestone.
A: Is the sample warm or cold?; B: How valuable is the sample?; C: Has the sample ever been melted?; D: Does the sample conduct electricity?
A: The atoms are broken.; B: The atoms are flattened.; C: The atoms remain the same.; D: The atoms are changed into different atoms.
A: colorless; B: flammable; C: boils at 78°C; D: density of 0.79 g/cm^3
A: It will make the study of DNA much simpler.; B: It proves that DNA is less important than originally thought.; C: It provides evidence that scientific results should not be challenged.; D: It demonstrates that scientific knowledge is subject to change.
A: Jupiter, Earth, Sun, Moon; B: Sun, Jupiter, Earth, Moon; C: Sun, Jupiter, Moon, Earth; D: Jupiter, Sun, Earth, Moon
A: having a large number of seeds; B: having a resistance to herbicides; C: having roots that develop rapidly; D: having leaves that form at a slow rate
A: absorb; B: deflect; C: reflect; D: refract
A: a map showing the routes of city buses; B: a map showing the locations of streets; C: a map showing the locations of houses; D: a map showing the elevations of ground surfaces
A: atmosphere; B: biosphere; C: hydrosphere; D: lithosphere
A: makes the conclusion accurate.; B: describes the variable.; C: states the problem.; D: reports the results.
A: They will die.; B: They will migrate.; C: They will hibernate.; D: They will grow faster.
A: coal; B: nuclear; C: solar electric; D: hydroelectric
A: The Giant Impact Theory; B: The Fission Theory; C: The Capture Theory; D: The Coaccretion Theory
A: a clock that measures seconds; B: a hand lens with a large lens; C: several insects that feed on other insects; D: a glass aquarium with food for the insect
A: metabolic production of methane; B: production of nitrates from inorganic nitrogen; C: aerobic breakdown of sugars to release energy; D: transformation of light energy into chemical bond energy
A: building hydroelectric plants; B: runoff from fertilized farm fields; C: burning of fossil fuels; D: release of chlorofluorocarbons from aerosol cans
A: They both need energy to survive.; B: They both consume other organisms.; C: They both absorb water from the ground.; D: They both produce their own food from sunlight.
A: Is it transparent?; B: Is it a hazardous sample?; C: What is the temperature of the substance?; D: Will it expand to the volume of a larger container?
A: Rain falls from the sky.; B: The sky is clear of clouds.; C: Water droplets appear on the grass.; D: Water droplets disappear from the grass.
A: Each group has a different feeding preference.; B: Each group has a different habitat preference.; C: Each group has different mating habits.; D: Each group is active at a different time of day.
A: landslides moving loose rocks downhill; B: sediments depositing on the seafloor; C: deltas forming at the mouth of rivers; D: mountains building up
A: Which musical notes can be perceived by the human ear?; B: Which musical notes combine to be the most beautiful?; C: Which frequencies can be heard by children but not by adults?; D: Which frequencies can be produced by human vocal cords?
A: once you have read the instructions; B: after you have checked your lab equipment; C: after the lab teacher tells you to begin; D: after the lab teacher reads the instructions
A: increased use of fossil fuels; B: decrease in water supply; C: loss of animal habitats; D: pollution of air
A: incline of the ramp is small.; B: surface of the ramp is smooth.; C: object is round and polished.; D: pull of gravity on the object is weak.
A: Copper should be recycled.; B: Copper costs less than other materials.; C: Copper is in low demand.; D: Copper does not make up commercial products.
A: the equipment for harnessing wind is inexpensive; B: wind produces less pollution than fossil fuels; C: energy from wind power is easy to store; D: wind is more efficient than fossil fuels
A: share the discovery with the public; B: do additional background research; C: analyze the results again; D: create a new hypothesis
A: She can call other scientists who also work in nerve research.; B: She can write a letter to hospitals that treat patients with nerve damage.; C: She can put her conclusions on a Web site that focuses on the nervous system.; D: She can publish her results in a scientific journal that covers issues relating to nerves.
A: the relative sizes of each state; B: the types of industry found in each state; C: the location of each state on the continent; D: the relative frequency of volcanic activity in each state
A: They divide vertically.; B: They produce gametes.; C: They conjugate.; D: They form spores.
A: converting sound to electrical impulses; B: receiving transmitted electrical signals; C: changing electrical impulses into sound; D: sending electrical signals through a circuit
A: Fat makes the polar bear large.; B: Fat makes the polar bear slippery.; C: Fat helps the polar bear run on ice.; D: Fat helps the polar bear float in water.
A: a flash flood; B: a lightning strike; C: a tornado; D: a hailstorm
A: abiotic factors; B: limiting factors; C: primary succession; D: secondary succession
A: condensation; B: deposition; C: classification; D: rotation
A: Burning coal only; B: Exploding fireworks only; C: Both burning coal and exploding fireworks; D: Neither burning coal nor exploding fireworks
A: rocks; B: water; C: frogs; D: soil
A: heat the solution; B: cool the solution; C: add more sugar to the pan; D: take some water out of the pan
A: by shielding them from predators; B: by increasing their food supplies; C: by eliminating diseases; D: by reducing the herd population
A: double pan balance; B: graduated cylinder; C: centimeter ruler; D: thermometer
A: The stems would wilt.; B: Sap would flow more quickly.; C: More flowers would be produced.; D: The leaves would be shed.
A: Repetition is needed to prove a hypothesis.; B: Repetition is required to publish a conclusion.; C: Repetition ensures the accuracy of obtained data.; D: Repetition helps scientists remain objective about observations.
A: keen eyesight; B: begging for food; C: ability to run fast; D: swimming in water
A: water; B: bacteria; C: fish; D: insects
A: increases the supply of resources; B: decreases the amount of resources; C: results in less demand for resources; D: improves the quality of the resources
A: encountering strong competition; B: having a long life span; C: producing identical offspring; D: having a diverse gene pool
A: They contain the code for messenger RNA.; B: They signal the start of mitotic cell division.; C: They ensure proper replication of the genetic code.; D: They are used to assemble amino acids for protein synthesis.
A: flowers and leaves; B: leaves and stems; C: stems and branches; D: branches and flowers
A: the average temperature of the water samples; B: the brand of microscope slide used; C: the magnifying power of the microscope; D: the proper identification of each microorganism
A: The plant should be shared with the smaller islands.; B: The plant should be cross-bred with deeper-rooted plants.; C: The plant should be uprooted from all regions in the island.; D: The plant should be fed to the native livestock on the island.
A: Fewer young warblers will hatch in the spring.; B: Warbler breeding season will start earlier.; C: Warblers will have a larger selection of mates.; D: Genetic diversity will increase among warblers.
A: A sperm cell must move in order to reach the egg cell.; B: An egg cell must divide into many separate sperm cells.; C: An egg cell must move in order to reach the sperm cell.; D: A sperm cell must combine with many different egg cells.
A: conduction; B: convection; C: evaporation; D: radiation
A: The primary function of the heart is to move blood through the body.; B: The purpose of the heart is to help perform athletic activities.; C: The rate of a beating heart can change throughout the day.; D: The heart is composed of different types of cells.
A: fats and starches; B: oxygen and sugar; C: proteins and amino acids; D: carbon dioxide and water
A: the place where the temperature is measured; B: the thermometer used to take the measurement; C: the person reading the temperature measurement; D: the time of day when the temperature is measured
A: apparent brightness; B: apparent motion; C: size; D: location
A: The energy an object has due to its motion.; B: The energy an object has due to its position.; C: The energy that increases the mass of an object.; D: The energy that increases the temperature of an object.
A: Water is a polar molecule.; B: Water has a high surface tension.; C: Water can change from a solid directly to a gas.; D: Water is less dense as a solid than as a liquid.
A: Butterfly life cycles have more stages.; B: Butterfly life cycles have an egg stage.; C: Butterfly life cycles have a pupa stage.; D: Butterfly life cycles have an adult stage.
A: Different predictions about the chemical were made.; B: Tests performed on the chemical had different results.; C: Repeated tests on the chemical reached the same conclusion.; D: Different procedures were used to test the properties of the chemical.
A: carbon; B: hydrogen; C: silver; D: sulfur
A: recommended serving size.; B: calories per serving.; C: a suggested meal plan.; D: a list of ingredients.
A: the ability to migrate; B: the ability to camouflage; C: the ability to produce body scents; D: the ability to produce body wastes
A: water -> grass -> fox -> hawk; B: sun -> rabbit -> moose -> wolf; C: grass -> spider -> mouse -> rabbit; D: dead mouse -> flies -> frog -> snake
A: an increase in fisheries production during upwelling; B: a decrease in larval fish populations during upwelling; C: an increase in algae and phytoplankton during upwelling; D: a decrease in surface water temperatures during upwelling
A: chloride and sugar; B: oxygen and sugar; C: nitrogen and sugar; D: carbon dioxide and sugar
A: altitude above sea level; B: types of local plant cover; C: circulation patterns of regional air masses; D: distance to the nearest mountain range
A: freezing; B: plant growth; C: rain; D: lightning
A: roll toy cars across each bridge until it collapses; B: place concrete construction blocks on top of each bridge until it collapses; C: stack coins on both ends of each bridge until it collapses; D: place D-cell batteries at the center of each bridge until it collapses
A: They are all multicellular.; B: They all reproduce sexually.; C: They all produce their own food.; D: They all have membrane-bound nuclei.
A: are longitudinal waves.; B: have the same frequency.; C: carry energy from one place to another.; D: carry a medium from one place to another.
A: a table; B: a pie chart; C: a photograph; D: a written paragraph
A: its weight; B: its favorite food; C: the color of its fur; D: the place where it lives
A: 1 (1A); B: 2 (2A); C: 17 (7A); D: 18 (8A)
A: They set up a secondary succession event.; B: They eliminate some competition for nutrients.; C: They allow larger trees to act as pioneer species.; D: They stimulate growth in smaller, shade-tolerant trees.
A: A brick wall; B: Eyeglass lenses; C: Liquid water; D: Stained glass windows
A: Primitive whales had teeth as adults.; B: Toothed whales descended from baleen whales.; C: Baleen whales are evolving into toothed whales.; D: Descendants of modern baleen whales will have both teeth and baleen as adults.
A: Earth-Moon-Sun; B: Earth-Sun-Moon; C: Moon-Sun-Earth; D: Moon-Earth-Sun
A: 0.25 V; B: 4 V; C: 15 V; D: 36 V
A: a cabin near the stream; B: rocks in the middle of the stream; C: acres of cleared forest above the stream; D: grasses growing along the banks of the stream
A: The Sun has many organisms living on it.; B: The Sun is in the Milky Way galaxy.; C: The Sun has moons revolving around it.; D: The Sun is a star made of gases.
A: Plants began appearing on Earth.; B: Dinosaurs became extinct on Earth.; C: Earth's continents became separated.; D: Earth's moon began orbiting.
A: distance between Earth and the Sun; B: time of rotation of the nearest galaxy; C: time in orbit of a satellite around Earth; D: distance between the Sun and the nearest star
A: pigs that are modified to have more fat; B: cows that are modified to require less feed; C: corn that is modified to be resistant to herbicides; D: soybeans that are modified to make their own insecticide
A: The block will balance the forces.; B: The forces will reverse direction.; C: The mass of the block will change.; D: The position of the block will change.
1: the same kingdom and the same species; 2: the same kingdom, but different species; 3: different kingdoms, but the same species; 4: different kingdoms and different species
A: Earth, the Sun, solar system, the Milky Way galaxy; B: the Moon, the Sun, Earth, the Milky Way galaxy; C: the Sun, the Moon, Earth, the Milky Way galaxy; D: solar system, the Milky Way galaxy, Earth, the Moon
A: The planet closest to the Sun.; B: The planet with the longest day.; C: The planet with the most moons.; D: The planet farthest from the Sun.
A: tongue rolling ability; B: athletic performance; C: language; D: color of eyes
A: water vapor; B: sulfur dioxide; C: ammonia; D: nitrogen oxides
A: Nature of Matter; B: Three Laws of Motion; C: Law of Independent Assortment; D: Relative Motion within the Solar System
A: heating; B: burying; C: eroding; D: weathering
A: Earth revolves around the Sun.; B: Earth rotates on its axis.; C: The Sun rotates on its axis.; D: The Moon revolves around Earth.
A: use a new battery; B: wear rubber gloves; C: clean the electrical wire; D: read all directions
A: Boiling water; B: Rusting iron; C: Burning wood; D: Baking bread
A: The Moon reflects light from the Sun all the time.; B: The Sun goes around Earth and the Moon every day.; C: Earth reflects light from the Moon all the time.; D: The Moon goes around Earth every day.
A: Warm-blooded animals have a higher metabolism in warm weather.; B: Warm-blooded animals are more aggressive in captivity.; C: Warm-blooded animals always have a higher blood temperature.; D: Warm-blooded animals normally maintain a fairly constant internal temperature at all air temperatures.; E: Warm-blooded animals are found only in warm climates.
A: mass.; B: color.; C: a definite weight.; D: a definite shape.
A: Pour a bucket a sand through the air.; B: Pour water over a pile of sand.; C: Filter sand through a screen into water.; D: Blow on a pile of sand through a straw.
A: geothermal energy; B: nuclear energy; C: hydropower; D: biofuel energy
A: young plant -> seed -> mature plant; B: seed -> mature plant -> young plant; C: seed -> young plant -> mature plant; D: mature plant -> young plant -> seed
A: the same species.; B: the same genus.; C: a different kingdom.; D: a different phylum.
A: at noon; B: at sunset; C: after midnight; D: before sunrise
A: low runoff, low evaporation, high transpiration; B: high runoff, low evaporation, low precipitation; C: low runoff, high infiltration, high condensation; D: high runoff, low infiltration, high precipitation
A: skeletal system; B: immune system; C: endocrine system; D: reproductive system
1: reproductive; 2: excretory; 3: digestive; 4: endocrine
A: inertia of the moon; B: location of earth's orbit; C: speed of Earth's rotation; D: Sun's gravitational pull
A: There will be more biodiversity.; B: The soil will be stripped of its minerals.; C: The air will be depleted of carbon dioxide.; D: There will be more oxygen released into the air.
A: 0.7 km/sec; B: 34.98 km/sec; C: 35.02 km/sec; D: 1750 km/sec
A: to produce oxygen through photosynthesis; B: to combine with other cells to form tissues; C: to subdivide to form cells for sexual reproduction; D: to transfer genetic information from one generation to the next
A: attempt to collect the specimen from the slide pieces; B: pick up the larger pieces of the slide; C: use a broom to sweep up all glass on the floor; D: inform the teacher of the accident
A: It protects them from freezing.; B: It prevents them from being eaten by consumers.; C: It protects them from breaking in strong winds.; D: It makes it very hard for them to be pulled from the ground.
A: Metals are soluble.; B: Metals conduct electricity.; C: Metals form a rigid structure.; D: Metals have a low melting point.
A: current wind conditions; B: type of clouds in the sky; C: percent humidity in the air; D: amount of rainfall
A: 20 mL; B: 16 N; C: 45 m; D: 90°C
A: Put some Quickgrow on a plant in the living room, put some Supergrow on a plant of the same type in the bedroom, and see which one grows the most.; B: Find out how much each kind of plant food costs, because the more expensive kind is probably better for growing plants.; C: Put some Quickgrow on a few plants, put the same amount of Supergrow on a few other plants of the same type, put all the plants in the same place, and see which group of plants grows the most.; D: Look at the advertisements for Quickgrow, look at the advertisements for Supergrow, and see which one says it helps plants grow the most.
A: the number of bubbles produced; B: the distance the filter paper rises; C: the diameter of the filter-paper disks; D: the time it takes for the filter paper to rise
1: A whole sugar cube is added and the water is stirred.; 2: A whole sugar cube is added and the water is not stirred.; 3: A crushed sugar cube is added and the water is stirred.; 4: A crushed sugar cube is added and the water is not stirred.
A: high temperatures; B: high humidity; C: slow winds; D: slow runoff
A: 50 ml of water; B: 100 ml of water; C: 5 grams of salt; D: 10 grams of salt
A: They both hibernate.; B: They both have feathers.; C: They both reproduce by laying eggs.; D: They both provide milk for their young.
A: depth of soil; B: amount of rainfall; C: the amount of land available; D: the number of seeds available
A: use an insulated cup rather than a paper cup; B: change the amount of hydrogen peroxide used; C: take a picture of the cup after the reaction took place; D: use a thermometer to measure the change in temperature
A: made of hydrogen and helium.; B: older than other objects in the solar system.; C: the source of most heat and light energy.; D: the strongest source of gravity in the solar system.
A: 1; B: 2; C: 3; D: 4
A: gravitational; B: kinetic; C: potential; D: thermal
A: transpiration and precipitation; B: precipitation and evaporation; C: evaporation and condensation; D: condensation and transpiration
A: pupa; B: fetus; C: embryo; D: adult
A: an observation; B: a prediction; C: a conclusion; D: a theory; E: a hypothesis
A: Roberta does more total work than Mary.; B: Mary does more total work than Roberta.; C: Roberta has a greater power output than Mary.; D: Mary has a greater power output than Roberta.
A: Eggs grow from seedlings.; B: Fruit forms flowers.; C: Seedlings grow from leaves.; D: Fertilized flowers form fruit.
A: air quality; B: plant diversity; C: solar radiation; D: thermal pollution
A: by mutating the birds' genetic traits; B: by altering the birds' social behaviors; C: by decreasing the birds' overall health; D: by increasing the birds' available energy
A: acquired trait to gain an inherited trait.; B: inherited trait to gain an acquired trait.; C: acquired trait to gain another acquired trait.; D: inherited trait to gain another inherited trait.
A: comet; B: planet; C: galaxy; D: star
A: physical change.; B: chemical change.; C: solute being dissolved.; D: new substance being formed.
A: mass of the Sun.; B: size of the Moon.; C: pulling force of other planets.; D: distance between other planets.
A: the skin; B: vitamins; C: red blood cells; D: white blood cells
A: oxygen, hydrogen and water; B: oxygen and hydrogen only; C: oxygen only; D: water only
A: read a story; B: use a ruler; C: cut up some leaves; D: use a magnifying glass
A: notify the teacher; B: wipe up the spill; C: tell a classmate; D: call the janitor
A: the weather; B: magnetism; C: solar energy; D: air density
A: 1 (1A); B: 2 (2A); C: 16 (6A); D: 18 (8A)
A: bacteria and fungi; B: fungi and scavengers; C: parasites and herbivores; D: decomposers and herbivores
A: Wood is easier to find than coal.; B: Wood has less carbon per unit mass than coal.; C: Wood grows more quickly than coal forms.; D: Wood has less stored energy per unit mass than coal.
A: carbon dioxide; B: glucose; C: water; D: sunlight
1: There is greater variation among the offspring.; 2: The offspring are identical to the parents.; 3: Only one parent is necessary for reproduction.; 4: No sex cells are needed for reproduction.
A: heat energy only; B: heat energy and sound energy only; C: heat energy, sound energy, and mechanical energy only; D: heat energy, sound energy, mechanical energy, and chemical energy
A: increase in pH toward a pH of 7; B: increase in pH away from a pH of 7; C: decrease in pH toward a pH of 7; D: decrease in pH away from a pH of 7
A: The weight decreases because the pieces of table salt are much smaller.; B: The weight increases because the table salt is spread throughout the water.; C: The weight stays the same because the amount of table salt does not change.; D: The weight is zero because the table salt has become a liquid.
A: lifting a box; B: an apple falling; C: pulling a nail out of wood; D: a car moving along a flat surface
A: A mutation caused a beneficial change in the fish.; B: A mutation caused a harmful change in the fish.; C: Longer spines caused a genetic change in the fish.; D: Longer spines caused a temporary change in the fish.
A: issued a press release to local television stations.; B: presented information to the scientific community.; C: discussed the scientific findings with students.; D: wrote a letter to the editor of its local newspaper.
A: Radio waves travel faster.; B: Infrared waves travel faster.; C: They both travel at the same speed.; D: The wave speed varies with their frequency.
A: -1; B: +1; C: -2; D: +2
A: attaching sugars to protein molecules; B: building larger molecules from sugars; C: creating simple sugars from smaller molecules; D: breaking down complex carbohydrates into simple sugars
A: thermal; B: chemical; C: magnetic; D: mechanical
A: The molecules in ice have more energy than the molecules in liquid water.; B: The molecules in ice contain different atoms than the molecules in liquid water.; C: The molecules in ice have more electric charge than the molecules in liquid water.; D: The molecules in ice are less free to move than the molecules in liquid water.
A: to create, test, and improve products; B: to manage the manufacturing of products; C: to persuade customers to buy the products; D: to label, package, and send products to retail stores
A: other lab groups investigating the same question; B: average growth rates of the plants published in a book; C: an experiment of different plants in the same environment; D: a new experiment done with larger plants
A: Both elk and bison will become extinct.; B: Populations of scavengers will decrease.; C: Bears and coyotes will become more numerous.; D: Populations of plants consumed by elk and bison will increase.
A: predation; B: parasitism; C: mutualism; D: commensalism
A: diagrams showing the steps used in the discovery; B: accurate records that show that the data are consistent; C: documents showing that the scientist is well known; D: proof that the equipment used in the discovery is of high quality
A: Earth constantly takes in more heat from the Sun.; B: Earth has forests that provide heat through photosynthesis.; C: Earth has oceans that store heat.; D: Earth absorbs extra heat from molten lava.
A: skeletal system; B: digestive system; C: endocrine system; D: reproductive system
A: to see which kind of water to use; B: to know which kind of sugar to use; C: to build a model of the experiment; D: to be able to repeat the experiment
A: be focused into a straight line.; B: lose energy and dissipate.; C: change length and direction.; D: reflect off the water's surface.
A: -1 m/s^2; B: -6 m/s^2; C: 3 m/s^2; D: 9 m/s^2
A: solid, only; B: liquid, only; C: solid and liquid; D: liquid and gas
A: Heat caused an increase in gas production.; B: Heat caused a new substance to form.; C: Heat caused a decrease in energy.; D: Heat caused a change in state.
A: butter; B: nitrogen; C: hydrogen; D: ammonia
A: excretory and skeletal systems; B: nervous and endocrine systems; C: circulatory and digestive systems; D: respiratory and circulatory systems
A: distribution; B: marketing; C: quality control; D: research
A: Archaea and Eukarya; B: Bacteria and Eukarya; C: Archaea and Bacteria; D: Archaea, Bacteria, and Eukarya
A: 15°C; B: 21°C; C: 27°C; D: 33°C
A: ensures high levels of competition.; B: increases the available ecosystem resources.; C: ensures the variety of reproductive methods for a species.; D: increases the chances of survival under changing conditions.
A: the smallest particle that has all the characteristics of a compound.; B: the smallest particle that has all the characteristics of an element.; C: a charged particle that is similar to a molecule.; D: a charged particle that is larger than a molecule.
A: Convergent margins create depressions.; B: Convergent margins cause volcanic eruptions.; C: Convergent margins compress and transform rock.; D: Convergent margins cycle sediments into the asthenosphere.
A: They can be measured.; B: They are 100% efficient.; C: They decrease at a constant rate.; D: They result in decreases in usable energy.
A: 1 year; B: 5 years; C: 10 years; D: 100 years
A: Slow changes allow time for adaptation.; B: Rapid changes require little adaptation.; C: Slow changes affect only small regions.; D: Rapid changes have a global effect.
A: people who own grocery stores; B: truck drivers who carry the fish; C: people who sell fish from the wild; D: construction workers who build the farms
A: the block's density; B: the amount of friction; C: the mass of the surface; D: the direction of motion
A: Gravity made the egg sink to the bottom of the beaker.; B: The vinegar caused the eggshell to dissolve.; C: The egg was denser than the vinegar.; D: Bubbles appeared on the eggshell.
A: Plants do not grow in desert conditions.; B: Few plants survive severe changes to their environment.; C: Plants native to Maryland are not good for scientific studies.; D: Plants native to Maryland are only able to survive in Maryland.
A: electron; B: neutron; C: nucleus; D: proton
A: Fly; B: Make noise; C: Breathe air; D: Sleep
A: What will be done to recycle the batteries?; B: What will be done with the refrigerant in the air conditioning system?; C: What will be done with the fluids in the gas tank, the radiator, and the batteries?; D: What will be done with the plastic materials in the vehicles?
A: water boiling in a pot; B: water being absorbed by plants; C: salt being removed from water; D: moisture on mirror after hot shower
A: How many fish are surviving the changing environment?; B: How have changes in weather affected the water level?; C: How much weight have the fish gained over the year?; D: How is the plant life in the lake adjusting to the changes?
A: decrease in air temperature; B: increase in rainfall amounts; C: slow movement of a glacier; D: rapid growth of plant roots
A: use water and release carbon; B: use sugar and release carbon; C: use carbon and release oxygen; D: use carbon and release nitrogen
A: It produces more food for the tree.; B: It increases the nutrients in the soil.; C: It releases more oxygen from the tree.; D: It decreases the competition for resources.
A: marine; B: terrestrial; C: photosynthetic; D: eukaryotic
A: Available energy increases as trophic levels increase.; B: Available energy decreases as trophic levels increase.; C: Primary consumers have the least energy available.; D: Tertiary consumers have the most energy available.
A: an ocean; B: a volcano; C: a river valley; D: a mountain chain
A: talking to someone under the water in a pool; B: hearing a loud whisper from across the room; C: hearing people talking on the other side of a wall; D: hearing thunder from a very distant storm
A: one student taking time measurements for one experiment; B: two students taking time measurements for one experiment; C: one student taking time measurements for three identical experiments; D: three students taking time measurements for two identical experiments
A: genes for dimples.; B: alleles for dimples.; C: chromosomes for dimples.; D: genotypes for dimples.
A: 100% black; B: 100% white; C: 50% black, 50% white; D: 75% black, 25% white
A: circulatory system; B: central nervous system; C: skeletal system; D: integumentary system
A: the presence of more impurities in ice than in liquid water; B: the ability of ice to float on liquid water; C: the release of heat when liquid water turns into ice; D: the cooling of liquid water as it flows over ice
A: They make waste products.; B: They are buried far underground.; C: They take a very long time to produce.; D: They are more expensive than nuclear fuels.
A: cooler air is transferred to the object.; B: energy in the object is transferred to the surrounding air.; C: atoms in the object react with the oxygen in the air.; D: energy in the object cancel out energy in the air.
A: to protect seeds; B: to produce food for seeds; C: to stop seeds from dispersing; D: to store water for seed germination
A: copper wire; B: glass rod; C: lead pipe; D: wooden stick
A: one that eats meat; B: one that uses plants for shelter; C: one that lives under the ground; D: one that builds nests on the ground
A: absorb minerals from the soil.; B: change water vapor into a liquid.; C: make sugar through photosynthesis.; D: break down dead plant and animal matter.
A: a rock; B: a crystal; C: a mineral; D: a bone
A: The distance is extremely large.; B: The distance is a rough estimate.; C: Only light can travel between stars.; D: Light signals were timed reflecting from the star.
A: CO_{2} has 2 atoms of carbon in it.; B: H_{2}O has 2 atoms of oxygen in it.; C: Twelve molecules of H_{2}O are produced.; D: Six molecules of CO_{2} are needed as reactants.
A: by ship; B: by train; C: by truck; D: by airplane
A: climb tall trees.; B: fit into small spaces.; C: hide when threatened.; D: shed its skin.
1: the continents were once joined together; 2: most life-forms that existed in the past are still present today; 3: most of Earth's surface was once covered by molten rock; 4: rocks have been transformed from one type to another
A: lustrous; B: malleable; C: does not conduct heat easily; D: has a low specific heat capacity
A: sound; B: light; C: energy; D: water
A: There is less condensation.; B: There are fewer hurricanes.; C: There is greater precipitation.; D: There are more smog-filled areas.
A: four-chambered heart; B: herbivore; C: nurse young; D: cold-blooded
A: They bind to ribosomes.; B: They bind to tRNA.; C: They bind to RNA polymerase.; D: They bind to mRNA.
A: adult; B: egg; C: larva; D: pupa
A: Ask your principal where the best place is to study.; B: Survey the student body to see where they like to study.; C: Record the level of decibels in various places in the school, and compare the results.; D: Have everyone be as quiet as possible, and then test the decibels in various places in your school.
A: longitudinal; B: transverse; C: compressional; D: magnetic
A: nuclear fuel.; B: biogas.; C: coal gas.; D: diesel fuel.
1: perform photosynthesis; 2: provide food for early development; 3: decompose dead organisms; 4: reproduce sexually
A: smell each sample in order to identify it; B: guess which beaker contains each substance; C: mix the substances together to determine what they are; D: safely discard the samples and get new ones
A: fruits; B: grains; C: cheese; D: vegetables
A: A piece of metal is cut in half.; B: An ice cube melts on a counter.; C: A camper roasts marshmallows over a burning fire.; D: A baker mixes together flour and sugar to make dough.
A: The worm feels cold.; B: The worm is a heterotroph.; C: The worm has 33 segments.; D: The worm has a four-chambered heart.
A: practical and economic; B: economic and ecological; C: ecological and ethical; D: ethical and practical
A: Some native plant populations will increase.; B: Some native plant populations will decline.; C: Water temperatures will fluctuate rapidly.; D: The water will become brackish.
A: to validate results; B: to achieve different results; C: to disprove other scientists' results; D: to obtain the same results a different way
A: by making the comb more absorbent; B: by giving the comb an electrical charge; C: by increasing the thermal energy of the comb; D: by breaking some of the chemical bonds in the comb
A: Hail; B: Wind; C: Rain; D: Snow
A: availability of fresh water; B: varieties of plant life; C: changes in elevation; D: proximity to the ocean
A: Insulin stimulates cells to absorb glucose from the blood.; B: Insulin causes the liver to release glucose into the blood.; C: Insulin facilitates the effects of antibiotics in the cell.; D: Insulin develops chemical bonds on the cell membrane.
1: their masses, only; 2: their diameters, only; 3: their masses and how far apart they are; 4: their diameters and how far apart they are
A: always much closer to the Sun than it is to the Earth; B: always much closer to the Earth than it is to the Sun; C: about the same distance from the Sun as it is from the Earth; D: sometimes closer to the Sun than it is to the Earth and sometimes closer to the Earth than it is to the Sun
A: They tend to make them warmer.; B: They tend to make them colder.; C: They tend to increase temperature ranges.; D: They tend to reduce temperature ranges.
A: nucleus; B: cell wall; C: cytoplasm; D: cell membrane
A: wooden block; B: paper cup; C: metal nail; D: glass bottle
A: a prediction; B: a hypothesis; C: a list of supplies; D: a table of results
A: 14; B: 16; C: 17; D: 18
A: More predators were introduced into the lake.; B: Water was depleted of nutrients such as nitrogen.; C: Breeding season for the organisms came to an end.; D: Decomposing algae lowered the amount of dissolved oxygen.
A: aluminum; B: copper; C: plastic; D: water
A: newtons; B: joules; C: volts; D: watts
A: carbon dioxide and nitrogen; B: sugar and carbon dioxide; C: oxygen and nitrogen; D: sugar and oxygen
A: Rubber band; B: Cloth ribbon; C: Leather shoe; D: Wooden board
A: A bird builds its nest in a cactus.; B: A rattlesnake shakes its tail when threatened.; C: A lizard crawls under a rock for shelter.; D: The ears of a jackrabbit release heat.
A: determine what materials should be used to implement the plan; B: conduct research on energy conservation to form the plan; C: improve the design of the plan; D: test the validity of the plan
A: long, thin limbs; B: long, strong limbs; C: short, thin limbs; D: short, strong limbs
A: farmers working to protect the environment.; B: natural substances being used to solve problems.; C: farmers trying to decrease the amount of crops.; D: the solution for one problem creating another problem.
A: keep water balanced in cells.; B: prevent cavities in teeth.; C: heal cuts and scratches.; D: carry oxygen in blood.
A: It could get more sunlight.; B: It has a chance to reproduce.; C: It gets closer to water.; D: It makes more oxygen.
A: The soil temperature increased more quickly than the air temperature.; B: The air temperature increased more quickly than the soil temperature.; C: The soil temperature decreased more quickly than the air temperature.; D: The air temperature decreased more quickly than the soil temperature.
A: chemical; B: mechanical; C: radiant; D: thermal
A: The matter that makes up the car increases.; B: The amount of useful energy decreases.; C: The efficiency of the car increases.; D: The amount of heat energy decreases.
A: proton; B: isotope; C: nucleus; D: electron
A: A child learns to ride a bicycle.; B: A cat has a kitten with a broken leg.; C: A white dog has a puppy with white fur.; D: A person has a scar from a burn.
A: The water can change from a liquid to a solid.; B: The water can change from a solid to a liquid.; C: The water can change from a liquid to a gas.; D: The water can change from a gas to a liquid.
A: Erosion is slower than uplift at El Cajon Pass.; B: Plates are separating at El Cajon Pass.; C: Mountain building is slower than erosion at El Cajon Pass.; D: Erosion and uplift are balanced at El Cajon Pass.
A: the ability of the snake to survive to reproduce; B: the appearance of other new traits in the baby snake; C: the history of the pattern in previous snake populations; D: the presence of thermal energy changing the snake pattern
A: the Moon does not rotate on its axis.; B: the far side of the Moon faces Earth during the day.; C: the Moon makes one rotation per revolution around Earth.; D: the rate of rotation is the same for Earth and the Moon.
A: Paper comes from a renewable resource.; B: Plastic comes from a renewable resource.; C: Plastic cannot be reused.; D: Paper cannot be reused.
A: Diversity will increase as the rate of predation decreases.; B: Diversity will decrease as competition for space increases.; C: Diversity will increase as the recycling of nutrients decreases.; D: Diversity will decrease as food and oxygen supplies increase.
A: R; B: rr; C: Rr; D: RR
A: Plants keep water in their roots.; B: Plants release nitrogen into the soil.; C: Plants provide shelter from the weather.; D: Plants make sugar in the presence of light.
A: Amoebas can change their shape.; B: Amoebas need humans to survive.; C: Amoebas look just like human cells.; D: Amoebas are made of only one cell.
A: the melting of the polar ice caps; B: the shifting of biomes as climates change; C: the prevalence of granite on all the continents; D: the presence of volcanoes around the Pacific rim
A: diverging continental plates; B: collision of tectonic plates; C: movement of glaciers; D: impacts from meteors
A: summer; B: fall; C: winter; D: spring
A: volcanoes; B: convection; C: molten rock; D: radioactive isotopes
A: Heat moves from her hand to the ice cube.; B: Cold moves from her hand to the ice cube.; C: Heat moves from the ice cube to her hand.; D: Cold moves from the ice cube to her hand.
A: placing the coin in a freezer; B: placing the coin in cool water; C: leaving the coin on a counter; D: rubbing the coin with cold hands
A: lightning.; B: air pollution.; C: condensation.; D: cellular respiration.
A: during a full moon only; B: during a full and new moon only; C: during a waning gibbous moon only; D: during a waxing gibbous moon only
A: Only plant cells can grow.; B: Only animal cells can reproduce.; C: Only animal cells can store energy.; D: Only plant cells can perform photosynthesis.
A: molding a clay figure; B: breaking a drinking glass; C: crushing ice cubes; D: cooking eggs on a stove
A: The trees would reduce the force of the wind.; B: The windmills would destroy the forests.; C: The electricity generated would be too far away from cities to be useful.; D: Forest animals would destroy the windmills.
A: Chemicals are released to indicate thirst.; B: Muscles make lactic acid.; C: Breathing rate increases.; D: Perspiration occurs.
A: A cantaloupe; B: A grape; C: A lime; D: A cherry
A: It stops moving.; B: It moves slower.; C: It moves faster in the same direction it was moving.; D: It keeps moving in the same speed and direction.
A: The fish migrated from the ocean; B: The fish was unable to reproduce; C: A mountain used to be in this area; D: A river used to run through this area
A: cigarettes and snuff; B: chewing tobacco and snuff; C: cigarettes and chewing tobacco; D: cigarettes, chewing tobacco, and snuff
A: northeast; B: northwest; C: southeast; D: southwest
A: The heart removes waste built up in the lungs.; B: Oxygen enters the bloodstream directly from the nose.; C: Oxygen is transferred to the bloodstream as blood passes by the lungs.; D: The heart pumps air into the blood through the lungs.
A: if the snowfall set a record; B: if the snowfall was unusual for the area; C: if the snowfall was consistent with weather in December over time; D: if the snowfall remained on the ground for longer than one month
A: Lightning strikes a building.; B: A fire burns down a house.; C: Electricity heats an oven.; D: The wind blows down a sign.
A: is clear and sunny; B: is partly sunny; C: has thick, dark clouds; D: has white, puffy clouds
A: 0%; B: 25%; C: 50%; D: 75%
A: glass; B: metal; C: water; D: wood
A: How do lysosomes expel bacteria from cells?; B: What role does the cell membrane play in stability?; C: How do chloroplasts convert light into energy?; D: Why are ribosomes efficient protein producers?
A: A southward dip in the jet stream; B: A northward movement of the jet stream; C: The Coriolis effect creating a low pressure area; D: The Coriolis effect creating a high pressure area
A: to be able to start another investigation; B: to prove the investigation is important; C: to learn why the hypothesis is correct; D: to make sure the results are valid
A: the type of soil they use; B: the amount of water they use; C: the color of the pots they use; D: the color of light bulb they use
A: a magnet; B: a glass cup; C: a filter paper and funnel; D: water
A: length of wires in tension.; B: diameter of wires in tension.; C: height of support towers.; D: length of the bridge.
A: Cl_{2}; B: HZn; C: ZnCl; D: ZnCl_{2}
A: energy; B: minerals; C: protein; D: oxygen; E: water
A: be used to send messages.; B: store important information.; C: cause people to be distracted.; D: be used during emergencies.
A: the presence of a fluid mantle; B: the presence of Van Allen belts; C: the presence of gravitational force; D: the presence of water in three states
A: Plants provide humans with CO_2 for respiration.; B: Animals release CO_2, required for photosynthesis.; C: Plants provide humans with atmospheric nitrogen.; D: Animals release O_2, required for plant survival.
A: Write down the results of the experiment.; B: Repeat the same experiment several times.; C: Make another hypothesis about static electricity.; D: Conduct a different static electricity experiment.
A: decrease; B: increase; C: remain the same
A: to keep the eggs covered with water; B: to provide the eggs with nutrients; C: to hide the eggs from predators; D: to protect the eggs from sand
A: yarn being knitted into a sweater; B: the engine from a tractor being started; C: the metal on a bicycle forming rust; D: grass capturing the energy from sunlight
A: They outline the crater caused by the impact of an asteroid.; B: They follow the shape of the adjacent tectonic plates under the sea.; C: One volcano usually triggers a second volcano with its hot magma.; D: Volcanoes always form in rings because of underwater convection currents.
A: a mushroom; B: a coyote; C: a pine tree; D: a grassy meadow
A: The oceanic crust is thicker than the continental crust.; B: The continental crust is thicker than oceanic crust.; C: The oceanic crust is denser than the continental crust.; D: The continental crust is denser than the oceanic crust.
A: light waves.; B: sound waves.; C: infrared waves.; D: ultraviolet waves.
A: Rocks have many scratches.; B: Rocks contain fossils.; C: Rocks are covered by moss.; D: Rocks are deep underground.
A: 4; B: 5; C: 8; D: 9
A: Lysozyme causes mutations in bacterial cell wall molecules.; B: Lysozyme is destroyed as it digests bacterial cell wall molecules.; C: Lysozyme breaks a specific type of bond in a bacterial cell wall molecule.; D: Lysozyme is converted to another chemical by a bacterial cell wall molecule.
A: temperature; B: salinity; C: buoyancy; D: pressure
A: be in the same group.; B: be in the same period.; C: have nearly the same mass.; D: have the same number of protons.
A: too small.; B: too large.; C: not accurate.; D: not well defined.
A: what kind of environment existed long ago; B: what kinds of animals were alive long ago; C: what color the plants were long ago; D: what dinosaurs looked like long ago
A: nervous; B: skeletal; C: circulatory; D: respiratory
A: 325 km/h W; B: 490 km/h W; C: 980 km/h W; D: 1960 km/h W
A: The pressure at the core is very high.; B: The metals in the core are very heavy.; C: The temperature of the core is very low.; D: The chemicals in the core are very reactive.
A: Robins fly from Michigan to Georgia in the fall.; B: Chameleons change color to match their surroundings.; C: White-tailed deer grow longer hair that is hollow inside.; D: Carp settle on the bottom of a pond and cover themselves with mud.
A: pour the solution down the sink; B: neutralize the solution with a base; C: dilute the solution with more acid; D: absorb the liquid with paper towels
A: producing energy using hydroelectric plants; B: producing energy using coal; C: producing energy using oil; D: producing energy using natural gas
A: heat from Earth's core; B: radiation from the Sun; C: tidal effects of the Moon; D: motion of tectonic plates
A: The sand will dissolve in the water because sand in water is a solution.; B: The sand will dissolve in the water because sand in water is a mixture.; C: The sand will settle to the bottom because sand in water is a solution.; D: The sand will settle to the bottom because sand in water is a mixture.
A: forming a theory; B: designing a model; C: analyzing data; D: comparing to a control
A: The temperature of both cups will be the same.; B: Both samples in the cups will be in the same state.; C: Both groups will have the same mass with which they started.; D: The time required for the changes in states of matter will be the same.
A: Stars have the same temperature as the Sun.; B: Stars usually appear in groups called clusters.; C: The Sun is closer to Earth than other stars.; D: The Sun is younger than most other stars.
A: bacterium.; B: virus.; C: prokaryote.; D: eukaryote.
A: stay warm.; B: find a mate.; C: hunt for food.; D: be easily seen.
A: disease; B: lack of food; C: climate change; D: humans as predators
A: It is much windier at the coast than farther inland.; B: The temperature of the land remains fairly constant.; C: It is much less humid at the coast than farther inland.; D: The temperature of the ocean remains fairly constant.
A: ice; B: lakes; C: rivers; D: the atmosphere
A: water; B: nitrogen; C: sunlight; D: carbon dioxide
A: coal; B: sunlight; C: water; D: wind
A: Both animals are cold-blooded, but without feathers to keep warm, snakes get too cold to move.; B: Unlike birds, snakes are warm-blooded; they must hibernate during cold weather.; C: Unlike snakes, birds are cold-blooded; they are less affected by the cold than snakes.; D: Unlike snakes, birds are warm-blooded; they must eat food to maintain a constant temperature.
A: fluctuations in the size of a star; B: wobbles in the position of a star; C: flickers in the brightness of a star; D: changes in the fuel source of a star
A: baking a cake; B: frying an egg; C: burning a piece of toast; D: squeezing the juice from fruit
A: A disease was spreading.; B: Their habitat was destroyed.; C: Food sources were hard to find.; D: Their predators were disappearing.
A: amount of tannin in the bark; B: severity of hurricanes per season; C: number of days of sunlight per year; D: size of stilt- like root systems per tree
A: It allows crops to be unaffected by disease.; B: It allows crops to be grown in drier climates.; C: It allows crops to survive without fertilization.; D: It allows crops to survive in areas with fewer seasons.
A: using compost as a fertilizer for lawns and gardens; B: using water from washing machines to water lawns; C: using cars that are designed to use petroleum products; D: using more plastic bottles and disposing them in landfills
A: correct errors in DNA; B: transfer information from DNA to RNA; C: recycle RNA back into DNA; D: use RNA to manufacture proteins
A: an inherited trait.; B: a genetic mutation.; C: a behavioral adaptation.; D: an acquired characteristic.
A: What is the mass of the liquid?; B: What is the volume of the liquid?; C: How quickly will the liquid evaporate?; D: How quickly will the liquid boil?
A: the strength of the gravity; B: the shape of the orbit; C: the size of the planet; D: the length of the day
A: The plants and animals in lakes and ponds will be harmed.; B: The soil in the area will become more alkaline.; C: The thickness of the ozone layer will decrease.; D: Levels of air pollution will increase.
A: Earlier scientists did not use appropriate tools.; B: Pluto should not have been classified as a planet.; C: Classifications change as new evidence is gathered.; D: Review of planetary characteristics should occur every year.
A: The ball accelerated.; B: The ball did not move.; C: The ball changed direction.; D: The ball continued to move in the same direction.
A: a decrease in air pollution; B: an increase in the cost of energy; C: an increase in the use of fossil fuels; D: a decrease in electrical energy production
A: the electrical charge of the sound waves; B: the direction in which the sound waves travel; C: the amount of energy released by each sound wave; D: the type of material through which the sound travels
A: Gas changes to liquid.; B: Solid changes to gas.; C: Liquid changes to gas.; D: Liquid changes to solid.
A: genetic variation; B: mitosis; C: natural selection; D: succession
1: a 5-kg object accelerating at 10 m/s^2; 2: a 5-kg object accelerating at 20 m/s^2; 3: a 20-kg object accelerating at 4 m/s^2; 4: a 20-kg object accelerating at 3 m/s^2
A: Respiration and photosynthesis both add carbon to the atmosphere.; B: Respiration and photosynthesis both remove carbon from the atmosphere.; C: Respiration adds carbon to the atmosphere, while photosynthesis removes carbon from the atmosphere.; D: Photosynthesis adds carbon to the atmosphere, while respiration removes carbon from the atmosphere.
A: a hypothesis.; B: a conclusion.; C: an assumption.; D: an observation.
A: positively charged.; B: negatively charged.; C: radioactive.; D: neutral.
A: cold milk; B: warm soup; C: water melting from ice; D: steam rising from boiling water
A: Radio waves are visible.; B: Radio waves have a high frequency.; C: Radio waves spread in all directions.; D: Radio waves are created by the animal.
A: The parents are of a different genus and a different species.; B: The parents are of a different species, but of the same genus.; C: The parents are of the same genus and of the same species.; D: The parents are of the same species, but of a different genus.
A: summarizing the data in an investigation.; B: conducting the final steps of an experiment.; C: changing the procedures during an experiment.; D: predicting what will happen in an investigation.
A: It converts sunlight to energy.; B: It controls all functions of the cell.; C: It transports water throughout the cell.; D: It breaks down sugar to release energy.
A: It increases the supply of resources.; B: It decreases the amount of resources.; C: It results in less demand for resources.; D: It improves the quality of the resources.
A: a piece of wood burning; B: a copper roof changing color; C: rust forming on an iron fence; D: a sheet of paper shredding
A: Both need energy.; B: Both have cell walls.; C: Both move with pseudopodia.; D: Both consume carbon dioxide.
A: They have nearly the same atmosphere.; B: They have almost the same gravitational pull.; C: They have a rocky crust that includes mountains.; D: They have areas that show considerable water erosion.
A: 2 times; B: 4 times; C: 8 times; D: 16 times
A: light; B: heat; C: sound; D: mechanical
A: green vegetables; B: dairy products; C: lean meats; D: whole grains
A: Which seeds grew well in the dark?; B: Which seeds produced the tallest plants?; C: Which seeds survived in cold temperatures?; D: Which seeds needed the least amount of water?
A: cool and dry; B: warm and dry; C: cool and wet; D: warm and wet
A: Report spills to your teacher immediately.; B: Wear a protective eye shield.; C: Pay close attention to instructions.; D: Smell the chemicals that are being mixed.
A: Discuss their observations with other groups in their class.; B: Conduct the experiment with more than one type of plant.; C: Record daily information in a data table.; D: Make up explanations for the results.
A: cracking open a geode; B: adjusting a microscope; C: spraying water on plants; D: adding salt to boiling water
1: 23; 2: 47; 3: 94; 4: 188
A: ocean currents; B: wind direction; C: air temperature; D: relative humidity
A: coffee warming a cup; B: hot air warming a room; C: the sun warming the moon; D: a hot plate warming a beaker
A: a sharp knife; B: a magnifying glass; C: a long piece of string; D: a large jar with air holes in the top
A: 4 minutes; B: 8 minutes; C: 12 minutes; D: 15 minutes
A: Hunting occurs while flying through the air.; B: They build their nests on cliffs or rock outcroppings.; C: Offspring depend upon parent feeding after hatching.; D: The color of their feathers lacks environmental camouflage.
A: 4-6; B: 5-7; C: 7-9; D: 10-12
A: run on a direct current.; B: are connected in series.; C: are connected in parallel.; D: run on an alternating current.
A: tidal energy and hydropower; B: geothermal energy and hydropower; C: wind energy and tidal energy; D: geothermal energy and wind energy
A: grows and changes.; B: is no longer valid.; C: becomes a law.; D: diminishes in value.
A: car engine.; B: refrigerator.; C: frying pan.; D: glass bottle.
A: wire.; B: battery.; C: switch.; D: bulb.
A: clean up the broken glass; B: replace the broken test tube; C: report the accident to the teacher; D: move to a new laboratory area
A: The balloons will move apart.; B: One balloon will lose its charge.; C: The balloons will come together.; D: One balloon will gain a negative charge.
A: They cool the land surface.; B: They carry acids into the soil.; C: They bring freshwater to land organisms.; D: They build up mountains.
A: a bird building its nest in a water tower; B: a rabbit's fur turning white in the winter; C: a lizard shedding its skin; D: a salmon swimming upstream
A: The properties of hydrogen will be better understood.; B: The availability of clean resources will increase.; C: The atmosphere will be supplied with oxygen.; D: The Sun's abundant supply of energy will be used.
A: increase resource availability.; B: improve existing products.; C: deplete available resources.; D: cause environmental degradation.
A: a cold rain falling to the ground; B: air masses combining to create a high-pressure area; C: winds spiraling downward and away from the center of a storm; D: air moving toward the center of a storm and rising into the atmosphere
A: -10°C; B: 0°C; C: 32°C; D: 100°C
A: shake the mixture until the sand settles on the bottom; B: pour the mixture through the filter paper; C: heat the mixture on the hot plate; D: dissolve the salt by adding water to the mixture
A: oil; B: gas; C: gold; D: lead
A: rivers; B: streams; C: estuaries; D: glaciers
A: sugar; B: water; C: energy; D: oxygen
A: Yes, because there is plenty of ocean water.; B: Yes, because ocean water has many natural fertilizers.; C: No, because ocean water is too salty for plants grown on land.; D: No, because ocean water is much more polluted than rainwater.
A: using larger screens with better color.; B: explaining how to avoid pressure from commercials.; C: providing a setting that encourages people to exercise more.; D: warning people of dangers such as bad weather or accidents.
A: The Moon has no gravity.; B: The Moon does not go around the Sun.; C: The Moon has little water and oxygen.; D: The Moon is much smaller than Earth.
A: A chemical change took place.; B: The lithium was dissolved by the water.; C: Dissolved gases were released.; D: Water was vaporized.
A: building power plants that use coal as fuel; B: clearing land for roads and buildings; C: directing fertilizer runoff to ponds; D: replanting trees in deforested areas
A: A solid changes to a gas.; B: A liquid changes to a gas.; C: A solid changes to a liquid.; D: A liquid changes to a solid.
A: Both the caterpillar and the leaf gain energy.; B: Energy is transferred from the leaf to the caterpillar.; C: Decomposers in the leaf obtain energy from the caterpillar.; D: The oak tree gains energy when the caterpillar eats the leaf.
A: Their mutation rates increase.; B: The presence and distribution of alleles diverge.; C: They respond differently to the same selection pressures.; D: They interbreed to maintain uniformity of traits.
A: surface atmosphere.; B: rocky terrain.; C: gravity.; D: size.
A: a hand lens with 1X magnification; B: a microscope with 40X magnification; C: a light microscope with 100X magnification; D: a dissecting microscope with 4X magnification
A: to keep the cost of the bus low; B: to ensure that the bus will be easy to replace; C: to provide ideas about how the bus will be built; D: to ensure that people know how to drive the bus
A: Pick up insects with bare hands.; B: Stay with a classmate at all times.; C: Reach under large rocks without looking first.; D: Work away from the group.
A: boiling.; B: evaporation.; C: conduction.; D: radiation.
A: Wings; B: Eyes; C: Soil; D: Air
A: The mix contains four ingredients.; B: The different ingredients clump together.; C: Each component maintains its original properties.; D: Components are impossible to separate out of the mix.
1: a cookie baking; 2: paper burning; 3: ice cream melting; 4: a nail rusting
A: divergent boundary between two oceanic plates; B: divergent boundary between an oceanic plate and a continental plate; C: convergent boundary between an oceanic plate and a continental plate; D: convergent boundary between two continental plates
A: The Sun is closer to Earth in the summer than in the winter.; B: The Sun has more sunspots in the summer than in the winter.; C: Earth's western hemisphere is tilted toward the Sun during the summer.; D: Earth's northern hemisphere is tilted toward the Sun during the summer.
A: The amplitude would double.; B: The frequency would double.; C: The amplitude would decrease by half.; D: The frequency would decrease by half.
A: caused by physical vibrations.; B: moved by the force of gravity.; C: types of electromagnetic waves.; D: of the same frequency.
A: carpool to school; B: ride a bus to school; C: ride a bike to school; D: drive alone to school
A: advertising; B: shipping; C: storage; D: quality control
A: moisture forming on a mirror when you breathe on it; B: sweat forming on your body when you exercise; C: ice cubes melting when you put them in a warm liquid; D: rivers drying up during a very hot summer
A: vaccination; B: transportation; C: communication; D: sanitation
A: primary succession; B: habitat destruction; C: resource depletion; D: genetic mutation
A: The sample size was too large.; B: Scientists did not run the study.; C: Women were excluded from the study.; D: No medication was given to the men.
A: short hair; B: long arms; C: pierced ears; D: scar on the leg
A: a galaxy; B: a black hole; C: a neutron star; D: a solar system
A: Records provide clues to mistakes made in the investigation.; B: Records prove the investigation was conducted many times.; C: Records rule out the need to repeat the investigation.; D: Records make the results from the investigation accurate.
A: Earth has completed one rotation around the Moon.; B: Earth has completed one revolution around the Sun.; C: The Sun has completed one revolution around Earth.; D: The Moon has completed one revolution around Earth.
A: Both carry energy.; B: Both travel in vacuums.; C: Both are caused by vibrations.; D: Both are traveling at the same speed.
A: hairs on the back stand up when scared; B: decreased heart rate when sleeping; C: movement of waste into the bladder; D: temperature increases during an infection
A: Test three sugar cubes, one each in three different water temperatures.; B: Test three sugar cubes in one water temperature.; C: Test one crushed sugar cube and one whole sugar cube in water.; D: Test three sugar cubes, one each in an acid, a base, and water.
A: island; B: plateau; C: rift; D: trench
A: the floor; B: the pull of gravity; C: the air friction on the ball; D: the person that throws the ball